Holy Communion, 
Commonly called the Mass. 
 
So many as intend to be partakers of the holy Communion shall signify their names to the Curate, over night: or else in the morning, before the beginning of Matins, or immediately after. 

And if any of those be an open and notorious evil liver, so that the congregation by him is offended, or have done any wrong to his neighbours by word or deed: The Curate shall call him, and advertise him, in any wise not to presume to the Lord's Table, until he hath openly declared himself to have truly repented, and amended his former naughty life: that the Congregation may thereby be satisfied, which before were offended; and that he have recompensed the parties, whom he hath done wrong unto, or at least be in full purpose so to do, as soon as he conveniently may. 

The same order shall the Curate use, with those betwixt whom he perceives malice, and hatred to reign, not suffering them to be partakers of the Lord's Table, until he know them to be reconciled. And if one of the parties so at variance, be content to forgive from the bottom of his heart all that the other hath trespassed against him, and to make amends for that he himself hath offended: and the other party will not be persuaded to a godly unity, but remain still in his frowardness and malice: The Minister in that case, ought to admit the penitent person to the holy Communion, and not him that is obstinate. 

Upon the day and at the time appointed for the ministration of the holy Communion, the Priest that shall execute the holy ministry, shall put upon him the vesture appointed for that ministration, that is to say: a white Alb plain, with a vestment or Cope. And where there be many Priests, or Deacons, there so many shall be ready to help the Priest, in the ministration, as shall be requisite: And shall have upon them likewise the vestures appointed for their ministry, that is to say, Albs with tunacles. Then shall the Clerks sing in English for the office, or Introite, (as they call it,) a Psalm appointed for that day. 

The Priest standing humbly before the midst of the Altar, shall say the Lord's Prayer, with this Collect.
ALMIGHTY God, unto whom all hearts be open, all desires known, and from whom no secrets are hid; Cleanse the thoughts of our hearts by the inspiration of thy holy spirit, that we may perfectly love thee, and worthily magnify thy holy name: through Christ our Lord. Amen. 

Then shall he say a Psalm appointed for the introite: which Psalm ended the Priest shall say, or else the Clerks shall sing,
	iii. Lord have mercy upon us.
	iii. Christ have mercy upon us.
	iii. Lord have mercy upon us. 

Then the Priest standing at God's board shall begin,
GLORY be to God on high.
The Clerks. And in earth peace, good will towards men.
	We praise thee, we bless thee, we worship thee, we glorify thee, we give thanks to thee for thy great glory, 0 Lord GOD, heavenly king, God the father almighty.
	0 Lord the only begotten son Jesu Christ, 0 Lord GOD, Lamb of GOD, son of the father, that take away the sins of the world, have mercy upon us. Thou that take away the sins of the world, receive our prayer.
	Thou that sit at the right hand of God the father, have mercy upon us: For thou only art holy, thou only art the Lord. Thou only (0 Christ) with the holy Ghost, art most high in the glory of God the father. Amen. 

Then the priest shall turn him to the people and say,
The Lord be with you.
The Answer. And with thy spirit.
The Priest. Let us pray. 

Then shall follow the Collect of the day, with one of these two Collects following, for the king.
ALMIGHTY God, whose kingdom is everlasting, and power infinite, have mercy upon the whole congregation, and so rule the heart of thy chosen servant Edward the sixth, our king and governor: that he (knowing whose minister he is) may above all things seek thy honour and glory, and that we her subjects (duly considering whose authority he hath) may faithfully serve, honour, and humbly obey him, in thee, and for thee, according to thy blessed word and ordinance: Through Jesus Christ our Lord, who with thee, and the holy ghost lives and reigns, ever one God, world without end. Amen. 

ALMIGHTY and everlasting God, we be taught by thy holy word, that the hearts of Kings are in thy rule and governance, and that thou dost dispose and turn them as it seems best to thy godly wisdom: We humbly beseech thee so to dispose and govern the heart of Edward the sixth, thy Servant, our King and governor, that in all his thoughts, words, and works, he may ever seek thy honour and glory, and study to preserve thy people, committed to his charge, in wealth, peace, and Godliness: Grant this, 0 merciful father, for thy dear son's sake, Jesus Christ our Lord. Amen. 

The Collects ended, the priest, or he that is appointed, shall read the Epistle in a place assigned for the purpose, saying, The Epistle of Saint Peter, written in the ----- Chapter of ----- to the ----- 

The Minister then shall read the epistle. Immediately after the Epistle ended, the priest, or one appointed to read the Gospel, shall say,The holy Gospel, written in the ----- Chapter of ----- 
The Clerks and people shall answer, Glory be to thee, O Lord. 

The priest or deacon then shall read the Gospel: After the Gospel ended, the Priest shall begin,
I BELIEVE in one God.

The clerks shall sing the rest.
	The father almighty, maker of heaven and earth, and of all things visible and invisible: And in one Lord Jesus Christ, the only-begotten son of GOD, begotten of his father before all worlds, God of GOD, light of light, very God of very God, begotten, not made, being of one substance with the father, by whom all things were made, who for us men, and for our salvation came down from heaven, and was incarnate by the holy Ghost of the Virgin Mary, and was made man, and was crucified also for us under Pontius Pilot, he suffered and was buried, and the third day he arose again according to the scriptures, and ascended into heaven, and sits on the right hand of the father: and he shall come again with glory, to judge both the quick and dead.
	And I believe in the holy ghost, the Lord and giver of life, who proceeds from the father and the son, who with the father and the son together is worshipped and glorified, who spake by the Prophets. And I believe one Catholic and Apostolic Church. I acknowledge one Baptism, for the remission of sins. And I look for the resurrection of the dead: and the life of the world to come. Amen. 

After the Cred ended, shall follow the Sermon or Homily, or some portion of one of the Homilies, as they shall be hereafter divided: wherein if the people be not exhorted to the worthy receiving of the holy Sacrament of the body and blood of our savior Christ: then shall the Curate give this exhortation, to those that be minded to receive the same.
DEARLY beloved in the Lord, ye that mind to come to the holy Communion of the body and blood of our saviour Christ, must consider what Saint Paul writes to the Corinthians, how he exhorts all persons diligently to try and examine themselves, before they presume to eat of that bread, and drink of that cup: for as the benefit is great, if with a truly penitent heart, and lively faith, we receive that holy Sacrament; (for then we spiritually eat the flesh of Christ, and drink his blood, then we dwell in Christ and Christ in us; we be made one with Christ, and Christ with us;) so is the danger great, if we receive the same unworthily; for then we become guilty of the body and blood of Christ our saviour, we eat and drink our own damnation, not considering the Lord's body. We kindle God's wrath over us, we provoke him to plague us with divers diseases, and sundry kinds of death. Therefore if any here be a blasphemer, adulterer, or be in malice, or envy, or any other grevious crime (except he be truly sorry therefore, and earnestly minded to leave the same vices, and do tryst himself to be reconciled to almighty God, and in Charity with all the world), let him bewail his sins, and not come to that holy tabled; lest after the taking of that most blessed bread, the devil enter into him, as he did into Judas, to fill him full of all iniquity, and bring him to destruction, both of body and soul.
	Judge therefore yourselves (brethren) that ye be not judged of the Lord. Let your mind be without desire to sin, repent you truly for your sins past; have a lively and steadfast faith in Christ our saviour, be in perfect charity with all men, so shall ye be meet partakers of those holy mysteries. And above all things: ye must give most humble and hearty thanks to God, the father, the son, and the holy ghost, for the redemption of the world, by the death and passion of our saviour Christ, both God and man, who did humble himself, even to the death upon the cross, for us miserable sinners, which lay in darkness and the shadow of death, that he might make us the children of God: and exalt us to everlasting life. And to the end that we should always remember the exceeding love of our master, and only saviour Jesus Christ, thus dying for us, and the innumerable benefits (which by his precious blood-shedding) he hath obtained to us, he hath left in those holy mysteries, as a pledge of his love, and a continual remembrance the same his own blessed body, and precious blood, for us to feed upon spiritually, to our endless comfort and relief. To him therefore, with the father and the holy ghost, let us give (as we are most bounden) continual thanks, submitting ourselves wholly to his holy will and pleasure, and studying to serve him in true holiness and righteousness, all the days of our life. Amen. 

In Cathedral churches or other places, where there is daily Communion, it shall be sufficient to read this exhortation above written, once in a month. And in parish churches, upon the weekdays it may be left unsaid. 

And if upon the Sunday or holy days the people be negligent to come to the Communion: Then shall the Priest earnestly exhort his parishioners, to dispose themselves to the receiving of the holy communion more diligently, saying these or like words unto them.
DEAR friends, and you especially upon whose souls I have cure and charge, on ----- next, I do intend by God's grace, to offer to all such as shall be godly disposed, the most comfortable Sacrament of the body and blood of Christ, to be taken of them in the remembrance of his most fruitful and glorious Passion: by the which passion we have obtained remission of our sins, and be made partakers of the kingdom of heaven, whereof we be assured and ascertained, if we come to the said Sacrament, with hearty repentance for our offences, steadfast faith in God's mercy, and earnest mind to obey God's will, and to offend no more. Wherefore our duty is, to come to these holy mysteries, with most hearty thanks to be given to almighty GOD, for his infinite mercy and benefits given and bestowed upon us his unworthy servants, for whom he hath not only given his body to death, and shed his blood, but also doth vouchsave in a Sacrament and Mystery, to give us his said body and blood to feed upon spiritually. The which Sacrament being so Divine and holy a thing, and so comfortable to them which receive it worthily, and so dangerous to them that will presume to take the same unworthily: My duty is to exhort you in the mean season, to consider the greatness of the thing, and to search and examine your own consciences, and that not lightly nor after the manner of dissimulers with GOD: But as they which should come to a most Godly and heavenly Banquet, to to come but in the marriage garment required of God in scripture, that you may (so much as lies in you) be found worthy to come to such table. The ways and means thereto is,
	First, that you be truly repentant of your former evil life, and that you confess with an unfeigned heart to almighty God, your sins and unkindness towards his Majesty committed, either by will, word or deed, infirmity or ignorance: and that with inward sorrow and tears you bewail your offences, and require of Almighty God mercy and pardon, promising him (from the bottom of our harts) the amendment of your former life. And among all others, I am commanded of God, especially to move and exhort you to reconcile yourselves to your neighbours, whom you have offended, or who hath offended you, putting out of your hearts all hatred and malice toward them, and to be in love and charity with all the world, and to forgive other, as you would that God should forgive you. And if any man have done wrong to any other, let him make satisfaction, and due restitution of all lands and goods, wrongfully taken away or withholden, before he came to God's board, or at least be in full mind and purpose so to do, as soon as he is able, or let him not come to this holy table, thinking to deceive God, who sees all men's hearts. For neither the absolution of the priest, can any thing avail them, nor the receiving of this holy sacrament doth any thing but increase their damnation. And if there be any of you, whose conscience is troubled and grieved in any thing, laking comfort or counsel, let him come to me, or to some other discreet and learned priest, taught in the law of God, and confess and open his sin and grief secretly, that he may receive such ghostly counsel, advice, and comfort, that his conscience may be relieved, and that of us (as of the ministers of GOD and of the church) he may receive comfort and absolution, to the satisfaction of his mind, and avoiding of all scruple and doubtfulness: requiring such as shall be satisfied with a general confession, not to be offended with that do use, to their further satisfying, the auricular and secret confession to the Priest: nor those also which think needful or convenient, for the quietness of their own consciences, particularly to open their sins to the Priest: to be offended with them that are satisfied, with their humble confession to GOD, and the general confession to the church. But in all things to follow and keep the rule of charity, and every man to be satisfied with his own conscience, not judging other men's minds or consciences; where as he hath no warrant of God's word to the same. 

Then shall follow for the Offertory, one or more, of these Sentences of holy scripture, to be sung whilst the people do offer, or else one of them to be said by the minister, immediately before the offering.
LET your light so shine before men, that they may see your good works, and glorify your Father which is in heaven. St. Matth. v.
	Lay not up for yourselves treasure upon the earth; where the rust and moth doth corrupt, and where thieves break through and steal: but lay up for yourselves treasures in heaven; where neither rust nor moth doth corrupt, and where thieves do not break through and steal. St. Matth. vi.
	Whatsoever ye would that men should do unto you, even so do unto them; for this is the Law and the Prophets. St. Matth. vii.
	Not every one that saith unto me, Lord, Lord, shall enter into the kingdom of heaven; but he that doth the will of my Father which is in heaven. St. Matth. vii 
	Zache stood forth, and said unto the Lord, Behold, Lord, the half of my goods I give to the poor; and if I have done any wrong to any man, I restore four-fold. St. Luke xix.
	Who goes a warfare at any time of his own cost? Who plants a vineyard, and eats not of the fruit thereof? Or who feeds a flock, and eats not of the milk of the flock? 1 Cor. ix.
	If we have sown unto you spiritual things, is it a great matter if we shall reap your worldly things? 1 Cor. ix.
	Do ye not know, that they who minister about holy things live of the sacrifice; and they who wait at the altar are partakers with the altar? Even so hath the Lord also ordained, that they who preach the Gospel should live of the Gospel. 1 Cor. ix.
	He that sows little shall reap little; and he that sows plenteously shall reap plenteously. Let every man do according as he is disposed in his heart, not grudging, or of necessity; for God loves a cheerful giver. 2 Cor. ix.
	Let him that is taught in the Word minister unto him that teaches, in all good things. Be not deceived, God is not mocked: for whatsoever a man sows that shall he reap. Gal. vi.
	While we have time, let us do good unto all men; and speciality unto them that are of the household of faith. Gal. vi.
	Godliness is great riches, if a man be content with that he hath: for we brought nothing into the world, neither may we carry any thing out. 1 Tim. vi.
	Charge them who are rich in this world, that they be ready to give, and glad to distribute; laying up in store for themselves a good foundation against the time to come, that they may attain eternal life. 1 Tim. vi.
	GOD is not unrighteous, that he will forget your works, and labour that proceeds of love; which love ye have showed for his Name's sake, who have ministered unto the saints, and yet do minister. Hob. vi.
	To do good, and to distribute, forget not; for with such sacrifices God is pleased. Hob. xiii.
	Whosoever hath this world's good, and sees his brother have need, and shutteth up his compassion from him, how dwells the love of God in him? I St. John iii.
	Give alms of thy goods, and never turn thy face from any poor man; and then the face of the Lord shall not be turned away from thee. Tobit iv.
	Be merciful after thy power. If thou hast much, give plenteously; if thou hast little, do thy diligence gladly to give of that little: for so gatherest thou thyself a good reward in the day of necessity. Tobit iv.
	He that hath pity upon the poor lends unto the Lord: and look, what he lays out, it shall be paid him again. Prove. xix.
	Blessed be the man that provideth for the sick and needy: the Lord shall deliver him in the time of trouble. Psalm xli. 

Where there be Clerks, they shall sing one, or many of the sentences above written, according to the length and shortness of the time, that the people be offering 

In the mean time, whilst the Clerks do sing the Offertory, so many as are disposed, shall offer unto the poor men's box every one according to his ability and charitable mind. And at the offering days appointed, every man and woman shall pay to the Curate, the due and accustomed offerings. 

Then so many as shall be partakers of the holy Communion, shall tarry still in the quire, or in some convenient place nigh the quire, the men on the one side, and the women on the other side. All other (that mind not to receive the said holy Communion) shall depart out of the quire, except the ministers and Clerks. 

Then shall the minister take so much Bread and Wine, as shall suffice for the persons appointed to receive the holy Communion, laying the bread upon the corporas, or else in the paten, or in some other comely thing, prepared for that purpose. And putting the wine into the Chalice, or else in some fair or convenient cup, prepared for that use (if the Chalice will not serve), putting thereto a little pure and clean water: And setting both the bread and wine upon the Altar: then the Priest shall say.
The Lord be with you.
Answer. And with thy spirit.
Priest. Lift up your hearts.
Answer. We lift them up unto the Lord.
Priest. Let us give thanks to our Lord God.
Answer. It is meet and right so to do.
The Priest It is very meet, right, and our bounden duty, that we should at all times, and in all places, give thanks unto thee, 0 Lord holy father, Almighty, Everlasting God. 

Here shall follow the proper preface according to the time (if there be any specially appointed), or else immediately shall follow,
Therefore with Angels, &c. 
Proper Prefaces

Upon Christmas Day
BECAUSE thou did give Jesus Christ, thine only son to be born as at this day for us, who by the operation of the holy ghost, was made very man, of the substance of the Virgin Mary his mother, and that without spot of sin to make us clean from all sin. Therefore &c. 

Upon Easter Day
BUT chiefly are we bound to praise thee for the glorious resurrection of thy son Jesus Christ, our Lord, for he is the very Paschal Lamb, which was offered for us, and hath taken away the sin of the world, who by his death hath destroyed death, and by his rising to life again, hath restored to us everlasting life. Therefore &c. 

Upon Ascension Day
THROUGH thy most dearly beloved son Jesus Christ our Lord; who after his most glorious resurrection manifestly appeared to all his disciples, and in their sight ascended up into heaven, to prepare a place for us, that where he is, thither we might also ascend, and reign with him in glory. Therefore &c. 

Upon Whitsunday
THROUGH Jesus Christ our Lord, according to whose most true promise, the holy Ghost came down as at this time from heaven with a sudden great sound, as it had been a mighty wind, in the likeness of fiery tongues, lighting upon the Apostles, to teach them, and to lead them to all truth, giving them both the gift of divers languages, and also boldness with fervent zeal, constantly to preach the Gospel unto all nations, whereby we have been brought out of darkness and error, into the clear light and true knowledge of thee, and of thy son Jesus Christ. Therefore &c. 

Upon the Feast of Trinity
IT is very meet, right, and our bounden duty, that we should at all times, and in all places, give thanks unto thee, 0 Lord, almighty, everlasting God, which art one God, one Lord, not one only person, but three persons in one substance: For that which we believe of the glory of the father, the same we believe of the son, and of the holy ghost, without any difference or inequality: whom the Angels &c. 

After which preface shall follow immediately,
THEREFORE with Angels and Archangels, and with all the company of heaven, we laud and magnify thy glorious name, evermore praising thee, and saying,
	Holy, holy, holy, Lord God of Hosts: heaven and earth are full of thy glory: Hosanna in the highest. Blessed is he that comes in the name of the Lord: Glory to thee, 0 Lord in the highest. 

This the Clerks shall also sing.

When the Clerks have done singing, then shall the Priest, or Deacon, turn him to the people, and say,
Let us pray for the whole state of Christ's church. 

Then the Priest, turning him to the Altar, shall say or sing, plainly and distinctly, this prayer following:
ALMIGHTY and everliving GOD, which by thy holy Apostle hast taught us to make prayers, and supplications, and to give thanks for all men: We humbly beseech thee most mercifully to receive these our prayers, which we offer unto thy divine Majesty, beseeching thee to inspire continually the universal church with the spirit of truth, unity, and concord: And grant, that all they who do confess thy holy name, may agree in the truth of thy holy word, and live in unity and godly love. Specially we beseech thee to save and defend thy Servant Edward our King, that under him we may be Godly and quietly governed. And grant unto his whole council, and to all that he put in authority under him, that they may truly and impartially minister justice, to the punishment of wickedness and vice, and to the maintenance of God's true religion, and virtue. Give grace (O heavenly father) to all Bishops, Pastors, and Curates, that they may both by their life and doctrine set forth thy true and lively word, and rightly and duly administer thy holy Sacraments: and to all thy people give thy heavenly grace, that, with meek heart and due reverence, they may hear, and receive thy holy word, truly serving thee in holiness and righteousness all the days of their life: And we most humbly beseech thee of thy goodness (O Lord) to comfort and succour all them, which in this transitory life be in trouble, sorrow, need, sickness, or any other adversity. And especially we commend unto thy merciful goodness, this congregation which is here assembled in thy name, to celebrate the commemoration of the most glorious death of thy son: And here we do give unto thee most high praise, and hearty thanks, for the wonderful grace and virtue, declared in all thy saints, from the beginning of the world: And chiefly in the glorious and most blessed virgin Mary, mother of thy son Jesus Christ our Lord and God, and in the holy Patriarchs, Prophets, Apostles and Martyrs, whose examples (o Lord) and steadfastness in thy faith, and keeping thy holy commandments, grant us to follow. We commend unto thy mercy (O Lord) all other thy servants, which are departed hence from us, with the sign of faith, and now do rest in the sleep of peace: Grant unto them, we beseech thee, thy mercy, and everlasting peace, and that at the day of the general resurrection, we and all they which be of the mystical body of thy son, may altogether be set on his right hand, and hear that his most joyful voice: Come unto me, O ye that be blessed of my father, and possess the kingdom, which is prepared for you from the beginning of the world. Grant this, O father, for Jesus Christ's sake, our only mediator and advocate.
	O God heavenly father, which of thy tender mercy did give thine only son Jesus Christ to suffer death upon the cross for our redemption, who made there (by his oblation once offered) a full, perfect, and sufficient sacrifice, oblation, and satisfaction, for the sins of the whole world, and did institute, and in his holy Gospel command us to continue, to celebrate a perpetual memory of that his precious death, until his coming again: Hear us (0 merciful father) we beseech thee; and with thy holy spirit and word, vouchsafe to bl+ess and sanc+tify these thy gifts, and creatures of bread and wine, that they may be unto us the body and blood of thy most dearly beloved son Jesus Christ. Who in the same night that he was betrayed: (a) took bread, and when he had blessed, and given thanks, he brake it, and gave it to his disciples, saying: Take, eat, this is my body which is given for you, do this in remembrance of me.
	Likewise after supper he (b) took the cup, and when he had given thanks, he gave it to them, saying: drink ye all of this, for this is my blood of the new Testament, which is shed for you and for many, for the remission of sins: do this, as oft as ye shall drink it, in remembrance of me.
(a) Here the Priest must take the bread into his hands. (b) Here the Priest shall take the Cup into his hand
 
These words before rehearsed are to be said, turning still to the Altar, without any elevation, or showing the Sacrament to the people.
WHEREFORE, O Lord and heavenly father, according to the Institution of thy dearly beloved son, our saviour Jesu Christ, we thy humble servants do celebrate, and make here before thy divine Majesty, with these thy holy gifts, the memorial which thy son hath willed us to make, having in remembrance his blessed passion, mighty resurrection, and glorious ascension, rendering unto thee most hearty thanks, for the innumerable benefits procured unto us by the same, entirely desire thy fatherly goodness, mercifully to accept this our Sacrifice of praise and thanksgiving: most humbly beseeching thee to grant, that by the merits and death of thy son Jesus Christ, and through faith in his blood, we and all thy whole church, may obtain remission of our sins, and all other benefits of his passion. And here we offer and present unto thee (0 Lord) our selves, our souls, and bodies, to be a reasonable, holy, and lively sacrifice unto thee: humbly beseeching thee, that whosoever shall be partakers of this holy Communion, may worthily receive the most precious body and blood of thy son Jesus Christ: and be fulfilled with thy grace and heavenly benediction, and made one body with thy son Jesu Christ, that he may dwell in them, and they in him. And although we be unworthy (through our manifold sins) to offer unto thee any Sacrifice: Yet we beseech thee to accept this our bounden duty and service, and command these our prayers and supplications, by the ministry of thy holy Angels, to be brought up into thy holy Tabernacle before the sight of thy divine majesty; not weighing our merits, but pardoning our offences, through Christ our Lord, by whom, and with whom, in the unity of the holy Ghost: all honour and glory be unto thee, 0 father almighty, world without end. Amen. 
Let us pray.

AS our savior Christ hath commanded and taught us, we are bold to say. Our father, which art in heaven, hallowed be thy name. Thy Kingdom come. Thy will be done in earth, as it is in heaven. Give us this day our daily bread. And forgive us our trespasses, as we forgive them that trespass against us. And lead us not into temptation.
The Answer. But deliver us from evil. Amen. 

Then shall the priest say.
The peace of the Lord be always with you.
The Clerks. And with thy spirit.
The Priest. Christ our Paschal lamb is offered up for us, once for all, when he bare our sins on his body upon the cross, for he is the very lamb of God, that takes away the sins of the world: wherefore let us keep a joyful and holy feast with the Lord. 

Here the priest shall turn him toward those that come to the holy Communion, and shall say.
YOU that do truly and earnestly repent you of your sins to almighty God, and be in love and charity with your neighbours, and intend to lead a new life, following the commandments of God, and walking from henceforth in his holy ways: draw near and take this holy Sacrament to your comfort, make your humble confession to Almighty God, and to his holy church here gathered in his name, meekly kneeling upon your knees. 

Then shall this general Confession be made, in the name of all those that are minded to receive the holy Communion, either by one of them, or else by one of the ministers, or by the priest himself, all kneeling humbly upon their knees.
ALMIGHTY GOD father of our Lord Jesus Christ, maker of all things, judge of all men, we acknowledge and bewail our manifold sins and wickedness, which we from time to time, most grievously have committed, by thought, word and deed, against thy divine majesty, provoking most justly thy wrath and indignation against us, we do earnestly repent and be heartily sorry for these our misdoings, the remembrance of them is grievous unto us, the burden of them is intolerable: have mercy upon us, have mercy upon us, most merciful father, for thy son our Lord Jesus Christ's sake, forgive us all that is past, and grant that we may ever hereafter, serve and please thee in newness of life, to the honour and glory of thy name; Through Jesus Christ our Lord. 

Then shall the Priest standing up, and turning himself to the people, say thus,
ALMIGHTY GOD, our heavenly father, who of his great mercy hath promised forgiveness of sins to all them, with hearty repentance and true faith, turn unto him: have mercy upon you, pardon and deliver you from all your sins, confirm and strengthen you in all goodness, and bring you to everlasting life: through Jesus Christ our Lord. Amen. 

Then shall the Priest also say,
HEAR what comfortable words our saviour Christ saith, to all that truly turn to him.
	Come unto me all that travail, and be heavy laden, and I shall refresh you.
	So God loved the world that he gave his only begotten son, to the end that all that believe in him, should not perish, but have life everlasting
	Hear also what saint Paul saith.
	This is a true saying, and worthy of all men to be received, that Jesus Christ came into this world to save sinners.
	Hear also what saint John saith.
	If any man sin, we have an Advocate with the father, Jesus Christ the righteous, and he is the propitiation for our sins. 

WE do not presume to come to this thy table (0 merciful Lord) trusting in our own righteousness, but in thy manifold and great mercies: we be not worthy so much as to gather up the crumbs under thy table: but thou art the same lord whose property is always to have mercy: Grant us therefore (gracious Lord) so to eat the flesh of thy dear son Jesus Christ, and to drink his blood in these holy Mysteries, that our sinful bodies may be made clean by his body, and our souls washed through his most precious blood. Amen. 

Then shall the Priest first receive the Communion in both kinds himself, and next deliver it to other Ministers, if any be there preset, (that they may be ready to help the chief Minister,) and after to the people. 

And when he delivers the Sacrament of the body of Christ, he shall say to every one these words.
THE body of our Lord Jesus Christ which was given for thee, preserve thy body and soul unto everlasting life. 

And the Minister delivering the Sacrament of the blood, and giving every one to drink once and no more, shall say,
THE blood of our Lord Jesus Christ which was shed for thee, preserve thy body and soul unto everlasting life. 

If there be a Deacon or other Priest, then shell he follow with the Chalice: and as the Priest ministered the Sacrament of the body, so shall he (for more expedition) minister the Sacrament of the blood, in form before written. 

In the Communion type the Clerks shall sing,
	ii. O lamb of God, that take away the sins of the world: have mercy upon us.
	O lamb of God, that take away the sins of the world: grant us thy peace. 

Beginning so soon as the Priest doth receive the holy Communion, and when the Communion is ended, then shall the Clerks sing the post Communion. 

Sentences of holy Scripture, to be said or sung every day one after the holy Communion, called the post Communion.
	If any man will follow me, let him forsake himself, and take up his cross and follow me. Matt. xvi.
	Whosoever shall endure unto the end, he shall be saved. Mark. xiii.
	Praised be the Lord God of Israel, for he hath visited and redeemed his people: therefore let us serve him all the days of our life, in holiness and righteousness accepted before him. Luke i.
	Happy are those servants, whom the Lord (when he comes) shall find waking. Luke xii.
	Be ye ready, for the son of man will come at an hour when ye think not. Luke xii.
	The servant that knows his masters will, and hath not prepared himself, neither hath done according to his will, shall be beaten with many stripes. Luke xii.
	The hour comes, and now it is, when true worshippers shall worship the father in spirit and truth. John iiii.
	Behold, though art made whole, sin no more, lest any worse thing happen unto thee. John v.
	If ye shall continue in my word, then are ye my very disciples, and ye shall know the truth, and the truth shall make you free. John viii.
	While ye have light, believe on the light, that ye may be the children of light. John xii.
	He that hath my commandments, and keeps them, the same is he that loves me. John xiiii.
	If any man love me, he will keep my word, and my father will love him, and we will come unto him, and dwell with him. John xiiii.
	If ye shall bide in me, and my word shall abide in you, ye shall ask what ye will, and it shall be done to you. John xv.
	Herein is my father glorified, that ye bear much fruit, and become my disciples. John xv.
	This is my commandment, that you love together as I have loved you. John xv.
	If God be on our side, who can be against us? which did not spare his own son, but gave him for us all. Rome. viii.
	Who shall lay any thing to the charge of God's chosen? it is GOD that justifyeth, who is he that can condemn? Rome. viii.
	The night is passed and the day is at hand, let us therefore cast away the deeds of darkness, and put on the armour of light. Rome. xiii.
	Christ Jesus is made of GOD, unto us wisdom, and righteousness, and sanctifying, and redemption, that (according as it is written) he which rejoices should rejoice in the Lord. I Corin. i.
	Know ye not that ye are the temple of GOD, and that the spirit of GOD dwells in you? If any man define the temple of GOD, him shall God destroy. I Corin. iii.
	Ye are dearly bought, therefore glorify God in your bodies, and in your spirits, for they belong to God. 1 Cor. vi.
	Be you followers of God as dear children, and walk in love, even as Christ loved us, and gave himself for us an offering and a Sacrifice of a sweet savour to God. Ephes. v. 

Then the Priest shall give thanks to God, in the name of all them that have communicated, turning him first to the people, and saying.
ALMIGHTY and everliving God, we most heartily thank thee, for that thou hast vouchsafed to feed us in these holy Mysteries, with the spiritual food of the most precious body and blood of thy son our saviour Jesus Christ, and hast assured us (duly receiving the same) of thy favour and goodness towards us, an that we be very members incorporate in thy Mystical body, which is the blessed company of all faithful people, and heirs through hope of thy everlasting kingdom, by the merits of the most precious death and passion of thy dear son. We therefore most humbly beseech thee, 0 heavenly father, so to assist us with thy grace, that we may continue in that holy fellowship, and do all such good works, as thou hast prepared for us to walk in: through Jesus Christ our Lord, to whom with thee and the holy ghost, be all honour and glory, world without end. Amen. 

Then the Priest turning him to the people, shall let them depart with this blessing.
THE peace of GOD (which passes all understanding) keep your hearts and minds in the knowledge and love of GOD, and of his son Jesus Christ our Lord: And the blessing of God Almighty, the father, the son, and the holy Ghost, be amongst you and remain with you always.

Then the people shall answer.
Amen. 

Where there are no clerks, there the Priest shall say all things appointed here for them to sing.

When the holy Communion is celebrated on the workday, or in private houses: Then may be omitted, the Gloria in excelsis, the Cred, the Homily, and the exhortation, beginning Dearly beloved, &c. 

Collects to be said after the Offertory, when there is no Communion, every such day one.
ASSIST us mercifully, 0 Lord, in these our supplications and prayers, and dispose the way of thy servants, toward the attainment of everlasting salvation, that among all the changes and chances of this mortal life, they may ever be defended by thy most gracious and ready help; through Christ our Lord. Amen. 

O ALMIGHTY Lord and everlasting GOD, vouchsafe, we beseech thee, to direct, sanctify, and govern, both our hearts and bodies, in the ways of thy laws, and in the works of thy commandments: that through thy most mighty protection, both here and ever, we may be preserved in body and soul; through our Lord and saviour Jesus Christ. Amen. 

GRANT we beseech thee almighty God, that the words which we have heard this day with our outward ears, may through thy grace, be so grafted inwardly in our hearts, that they may bring forth in us the fruit of good living, to the honour and praise of thy name; through Jesus Christ our Lord. Amen. 

PREVENT us, 0 Lord, in all our doings with thy most gracious favour, and further us with thy continual help, that in all our works begun, continued, and ended in thee: we may glorify thy holy name, and finally by thy mercy obtain everlasting life: Through, &c. Amen. 

ALMIGHTY God, the fountain of all wisdom, who know our necessities before we ask, and our ignorance in asking: we beseech thee to have compassion upon our infirmities, and those things, which for our unworthiness we dare not, and for our blindness we cannot ask, vouchsafe to give us for the worthiness of thy son Jesus Christ our Lord. Amen. 

ALMIGHTY God, which hast promised to hear the petitions of them that ask in thy son's name, we beseech thee mercifully to incline thine ears to us that have made now our prayers and supplications unto thee, and grant that those things which we have faithfully asked according to thy will, may effectually be obtained to the relief of our necessity, and to the setting forth of thy glory: Through Jesus Christ our Lord. 

For Rain.
O GOD heavenly father, which by thy son Jesus Christ, hast promised to all them that seek thy kingdom, and the righteousness thereof, all things necessary to the bodily sustenance: send us (we beseech thee) in this our necessity, such moderate rain and showers, that we may receive the fruits of the earth, to our comfort and to thy honour; Through Jesus Christ our Lord. 

For Fair Weather.
O Lord God, which for the sin of man did once drown all the world, except eight persons, and afterword of thy great mercy did promise never to destroy it so again: We humbly beseech thee, that although we for our iniquities have worthily deserved this plague of rain and waters, yet, upon our true repentance, thou wilt send us such weather whereby we may receive the fruits of the earth in due season, and learn both by the punishment to amend our lives, and by the granting of our petition to give thee praise and glory: Through Jesus Christ our Lord. 

Upon Wednesdays and Fridays the English Litany shall be said or sung in all places, after such form as is appointed by the king's majesty's Injunctions: Or as is or shall be otherwise appointed by his highness. And though there be none to communicate with the Priest, yet these days (after the Litany ended) the Priest shall put upon him a plain Alb or surplice, with a cope, and say all things at the Altar (appointed to be said at the celebration of the lord's supper), until after the offertory. And then shall add one or two of the Collects aforewritten, as occasion shall serve by his discretion. And then turning him to the people shall let them depart with the accustomed blessing. And the same order shall be used all other days whenever the people be customably assembled to pray in the church, and none disposed to communicate with the Priest. 

Likewise in Chapels annexed, and all other places, there shall be no celebration of the Lord's supper, except there be some to communicate with the Priest. And in such Chapels annexed where the people hath not been accustomed to pay any holy bread, there they must either make some charitable provision for the bearing of the charges of the Communion, or else (for receiving of the same) resort to their Parish Church. 

For avoiding of all matters and occasion of dissension, it is meet that the bread prepared for the Communion, be made, through all this realm, after one sort and fashion: that is to say, unleavened, and round, as it was before, but without all manner of print, and something more larger and thicker than it was, so that it may be aptly divided in divers pieces: and every one shall be divided in two pieces, at the least, or more, by the discretion of the minister, and so distributed. And men must not think less to be received in part than in the whole, but in each of them the whole body of our saviour Jesus Christ. 

And for so much as the Pastors and Curates within this realm shall continually find at their costs and charges in their cures, sufficient Bread and Wine for the holy Communion (as oft as their parishioners shall be disposed for their spiritual comfort to receive the same) it is therefore ordered, that in recompense of such costs and charges, the parishioners of every Parish shall offer every Sunday, at the time of the Offertory, the just value and price of the holy loaf (with all such money, and other things as were wont to be offered with the same) to the use of their Pastors and Curates, and that in such order and course, as they were wont to find and pay the said holy loaf. 

Also, that the receiving of the Sacrament of the blessed body and blood of Christ, may be most agreeable to the institution thereof, and to the usages of the primitive Church: In all Cathedral and Collegiate Churches, there shall always some Communicate with the Priest that ministered. And that the same may be also observed every where abroad in the country: Some one at the least of that house in every Parish to whom by course after the ordinance herein made, it appertains to offer for the charges of the Communion, or some other whom they shall provide to offer for them, shall receive the holy Communion with the Priest: the which may be the better done, for that they know before, when their course comes, and may therefore dispose themselves to the worthy receiving of the Sacrament. And with him or them who doth so offer the charges of the Communion; all other, who be then Godly disposed thereunto, shall likewise receive the Communion. And by this means the Minister having always some to communicate with him, may accordingly solemnise so high and holy mysteries, with all the suffrages and due order appointed for the same. And the Priest on the week day shall forbear to celebrate the Communion, except he have some that will communicate with him. 

Furthermore, every man and woman to be bound to hear and be at the divine service, in the Parish church where they be resident, and there with devout prayer, or Godly silence and meditation, to occupy themselves. There to pay their duties, to communicate once in the year at the least, and there to receive, and take all other Sacraments and rites, in this book appointed. And whosoever willingly upon no just cause, doth absent themselves, or doth ungodly in the Parish church occupy themselves: upon proof thereof, by the Ecclesiastical laws of the Realm to be excommunicate, or suffer other punishment, as shall to the Ecclesiastical judge (according to his discretion) seem convenient. 

And although it be read in ancient writers, that the people many years past received at the priests' hands the Sacrament of the body of Christ in their own hands, and no commandment of Christ to the contrary. Yet forasmuch as they many times conveyed the same secretly away, kept it with them, and diversely abused it to superstition and wickedness: lest any such thing hereafter should be attempted, and that an uniformity might be used, throughout the whole Realm: it is thought convenient the people commonly receive the Sacrament of Christ's body, in their mouths, at the Priest's hand.

Saint Mary Magdalene.

The Introit. Psalm cxlvi.


The Collect.
MERCIFUL Father, give us grace, that we never presume to sin through the example of any creature; but if it shall chance us at any time to offend thy divine majesty; that then we may truly repent, and lament the same, after the example of Mary Magdalene, and by lively faith obtain remission of all our sins; through the only merits of thy son our saviour Christ.

The Epistle. Prove. xxxi.
WHOSOEVER finds an honest faithful woman, she is much more worth than pearls. The heart of her husband may safely trust in her, so that he shall fall in no poverty. She will do him good and not evil, all the days of her life. She occupies wool and flax, and labours gladly with her hands. She is like a merchant's ship that brings her vittles from afar. She is up in the night season to provide meat for her household, and food for her maidens. She considers land and buys it, and with the fruits of her hands she plants a vineyard. She girds her loins with strength, and courageth her arms. And if she perceive that her housewifery doth good, and candle goes not out by night. She lays her fingers to the spindle; and her hand takes hold of the distaff. She opens her hand to the poor, yea she stretches further her hands to such as have need. She fears not that the cold of winter shall hurt her house, for all her household folks are clothed with scarlet. She makes herself fair ornaments, her clothing is white silk and purple. her husband is much set by in the gates, when he sits among the rulers of the land. She makes cloth of silk, and sells it, and delivers girdles unto the merchant. Strength and honour is her clothing, and in the latter day she shall rejoice. She opens her mouth with wisdom and in her tongue is the law of grace. She looks well to the ways of her household, and eats not her bread with idleness. Her children shall arise, and call her blessed; and her husband shall make much of her. Many daughters there be that gather riches together; but thou go above them all. As for favour it is deceitful, and beauty is a vain thing: but a woman that fears the Lord, she is worthy to be praised. Give her the fruit of her hands, and let her own works praise her in the gates.

The Gospel. Luke vii.
AND one of the Pharisees desired Jesus that he would eat with him. And he went into the Pharisees house, and sat down to meat. And behold, a woman in that city (which was a sinner,) as soon as she knew that Jesus sat at meat in the Pharisees house, she brought an Alabaster box of ointment, and stood at his feet behind him weeping, and began to wash his feet with her tears, and did wipe them with the hairs of her head, and kissed his feet, and anointed them with the ointment. When the Pharisee (which had bidden him) saw that, he spake within himself, saying; if this man were a prophet, he would surely know who and what manner of woman this is that touched him, for she is a sinner. Jesus answered and said unto him; Simon, I have somewhat to say unto thee. And he said; Master, say on. There was a certain lender which had two debtors, the one ought him five hundred pence, and the other fifty. When they had nothing to pay, he forgave them both. Tell me therefore, which of them will love him most? Simon answered and said; I suppose that he to whom he forgave most. And he said unto him; thou has truly judged. And he turned to the woman, and said to Symon; See thou this woman? I entered into thy house, thou gave me no water for my feet: but she hath washed my feet with tears, and wiped them with the hairs of her head. Thou gave me no kiss: but she since the time I came in, hath not ceased to kiss my feet. My head with oil thou did not anoint, but she hath anointed my feet with ointment. Wherefore I say unto thee, many sins are forgiven her; for she loved much. To whom less is forgiven, the same doth less love. And he said unto her; thy sins are forgiven thee. And they that sat at meat with him, began to say within themselves. Who is this which forgives sins also? And he said to the woman. Thy faith hath saved thee; go in peace.
His Majesty's Declaration.

Being by God's ordinance, according to our just title, Defender of the Faith, and Supreme Governor of the Church, within these our dominions, we hold it most agreeable tothis our kingly office, and our own religious zeal, to conserve and maintain the Church committed to our charge, in the unity of true religion, and in the bond of peace; and not to suffer unnecessary disputations, altercations, or questions to be raised, which may nourish faction both in the Church and Commonwealth. We have, therefore, upon mature deliberation, and with the advice of so many of our bishops as might conveniently be called together, thought fit to make this declaration following:

That the Articles of the Church of England (which have been allowed and authorized heretofore, and which our clergy generally have subscribed unto) do contain the true doctrine of the Church of England agreeable to God's word: which we do therefore ratify and confirm, requiring all our loving subjects to continue in the uniform profession thereof, and prohibiting the least difference from the said Articles; which to that end we command to be new printed, and this our declaration to be published therewith:

That we are Supreme Governor of the Church of England; and that if any difference arise about the external policy, concerning injunctions, canons or other constitutions whatsoever thereto belonging, the clergy in their convocation is to order and settle them, having first obtained leave under our broad seal so to do: and we approving their said ordinances and constitutions, providing that none be made contrary to the laws and customs of the land.

That out of our princely care that the churchmen may do the work which is proper unto them, the bishops and clergy, from time to time in convocation, upon their humble desire, shall have licence under our broad seal to deliberate of, and to do all such things as, being made plain by them, and assented unto by us, shall concern the settled continuance of the doctrine and discipline of the Church of England now established; from which we will not endure any varying or departing in the least degree.

That for the present, though some differences have been ill raised, yet we take comfort in this, that all clergymen within our realm have always most willingly subscribed to the Articles established, which is an argument to us, that they all agree in the true, usual literal meaning of the said Articles; and that even in those curious points, in which the present differences lie, men of all sorts take the Articles of the Church of England to be for them; which is an argument again, that none of them intend any desertion of the Articles established.

That therefore in these both curious and unhappy differences, which have for so many hundred years, in different times and places, exercised the Church of Christ, we will, that all further curious search be laid aside, and these disputes shut up in God's promises, as they be generally set forth to us in the Holy Scriptures, and the general meaning of the Articles of the Church of England according to them. And that no man hereafter shall either print, or preach, to draw the Article aside any way, but shall submit to it in the plain and full meaning thereof: and shall not put his own sense or comment to be the meaning of the Article, but shall take it in the literal and grammatical sense.

That if any public reader in either our Universities, or any head or master of a College, or any other person respectively in either of them, shall affix any new sense to any Article, or shall publicly read, determine, or hold any public disputation, or suffer any such to be held either way, in either the Universities or Colleges respectively; or if any divine in the Universities shall preach or print any thing either way, other than is already established in convocation with our royal assent; he, or they the offenders, shall be liable to our displeasure, and the Church's censure in our commission ecclesiastical, as well as any other: and we will see there shall be due execution upon them.By the King.

Our dear father of blessed memory, in his return from Scotland, coming through Lancashire, found that his subjects were debarred from lawful recreations upon Sundays after evening prayers ended, and upon Holy-days; and he prudently considered that, if these times were taken from them, the meaner sort who labour hard all the week should have no recreations at all to refresh their spirits: and after his return, he further saw that his loyal subjects in all other parts of his kingdom did suffer in the same kind, though perhaps not in the same degree: and did therefore in his princely wisdom publish a declaration to all his loving subjects concerning lawful sports to be used at such times, which was printed and published by his royal commandment in the year 1618, in the tenor which hereafter follows:

'Whereas upon our return the last year out of Scotland, we did publish our pleasure touching the recreations of our people in those parts under our hand; for some causes us thereunto moving, we have thought good to command these our directions then given in Lancashire, with a few words thereunto added, and most applicable to these parts of our realms, to be published to all our subjects.

Whereas we did justly in our progress through Lancashire rebuke some Puritans and precise people, and took order that the like unlawful carriage should not be used by any of them hereafter, in the prohibiting and unlawful punishing of our good people for using their lawful recreations and honest exercises upon Sundays, and other holy days, after the afternoon sermon or service, we now find that two sorts of people wherewith that country is much infected, we mean Papists and Puritans, have maliciously traduced and calumniated those our just and honourable proceedings: and therefore lest our reputation might upon the one side (though innocently) have some aspersion laid upon it, and that upon the other part our good people in that country be misled by the mistaking and misinterpretation of our meaning, we have therefore thought good hereby to clear and make our pleasure to be manifested to all our good people in those parts.

It is true that at our first entry to this crown and kingdom we were informed, and that too truly, that our county of Lancashire abounded more in popish recusants than any county of England, and thus hath still continued since, to our great regret, with little amendment, save that, now of late, in our last riding through our said country: we find both by the report of the judges, and of the bishop of that diocese, that there is some amendment now daily beginning, which is no small contentment to us.

The report of this growing amendment amongst them made us the more sorry, when with our own ears we heard the general complaint of our people, that they were barred from all lawful recreation and exercise upon the Sunday's afternoon, after the ending of all divine service, which cannot but produce two evils: the one the hindering of the conversion of many, whom their priests will take occasion hereby to vex, persuading them that no honest mirth or recreation is lawful or tolerable in our religion, which cannot [Page 530] but breed a great discontentment in our people's hearts, especially of such as are peradventure upon the point of turning: the other inconvenience is, that this prohibition barreth the common and meaner sort of people from using such exercises as may make their bodies more able for war, when we or our successors shall have occasion to use them; and in place thereof sets up filthy tipplings and drunkenness, and breeds a number of idle and discontented speeches in their ale-houses. For when shall the common people have leave to exercise, if not upon the Sundays and holy days, seeing they must apply their labour and win their living in all working-days?

Our express pleasure therefore is, that the laws of our kingdom and canons of our Church be as well observed in that county, as in all other places of this our kingdom: and on the other part, that no lawful recreation shall be barred to our good people, which shall not tend to the breach of our aforesaid laws and canons of our Church: which to express more particularly, our pleasure is, that the bishop, and all other inferior churchmen and churchwardens, shall for their parts be careful and diligent, both to instruct the ignorant, and convince and reform them that are misled in religion, presenting them that will not conform themselves, but obstinately stand out, to our judges and justices: whom we likewise command to put the law in due execution against them.

Our pleasure likewise is, that the bishop of that diocese take the like strait order with all the Puritans and Precisians within the same, either constraining them to conform themselves or to leave the county, according to the laws of our kingdom and canons of our Church, and so to strike equally on both hands against the contemners of our authority and adversaries of our Church: and as for our good people's lawful recreation, our pleasure likewise is, that after the end of divine service our good people be not disturbed, let or discouraged from any lawful recreation, such as dancing, either men or women; archery for men, leaping, vaulting, or any other such harmless recreation, nor from having of May-games, Whitsun-ales, and Morris-dances; and the setting up of May-poles and other sports therewith used: so as the same be had in due and convenient time, without impediment or neglect of divine service: and that women shall have leave to carry rushes to the church for the decorating of it, according to their old custom; but withal we do here account still as prohibited all unlawful games to be used upon Sundays only, as bear and bull-baitings, interludes, and at all times in the meaner sort of people by law prohibited, bowling.

And likewise we bar from this benefit and liberty all such known as recusants, either men or women, as will abstain from coming to church or divine service, being therefore unworthy of any lawful recreation after the said service, that will not first come to the church and serve God: prohibiting in like sort the said recreations to any that, though [they] conform in religion, are not present in the church at the service of God, before their going to the said recreations. Our pleasure likewise is, that they to whom it belongs in office, shall present and sharply punish all such, as in abuse of this our liberty, will use these exercises before the ends of all divine services for that day: and we likewise straightly command that every person shall resort to his own parish church to hear divine service, and each parish by itself to use the said recreation after divine service: prohibiting likewise any offensive weapons to be carried or used in the said times of recreation: and our pleasure is, that this our declaration shall be published by order from the bishop of the diocese, through all the parish churches, and that both our judges of our circuit, and our justices of our peace be informed thereof.

Given at our Manor of Greenwich the four-and-twentieth day of May, in the sixteenth year of our reign, of England, France, and Ireland; and of Scotland the one-and-fiftieth.'

Now out of a like pious care for the service of God, and for suppressing of any humours that oppose truth, and for the ease, comfort, and recreation of our well-deserving people, we do ratify and publish this our blessed father's declaration: the rather, because of late in some counties of our kingdom, we find that under pretence of taking away abuses, there hath been a general forbidding, not only of ordinary meetings, but of the feasts of the dedication of the churches, commonly called wakes. Now our express will and pleasure is, that these feasts, with others, shall be observed, and that our justices of the peace, in their several divisions, shall look to it, both that all disorders there may be prevented or punished, and that all neighbourhood and freedom, with manlike and lawful exercises be used: and we further command our justices of assize in their several circuits to see that no man do trouble or molest any of our loyal and dutiful people, in or for their lawful recreations, having first done their duty to God, and continuing in obedience to us and our laws: and for this we command all our judges, justices of peace, as well within liberties as without, mayors, bailiffs, constables, and other officers, to take notice of; and to see observed, as they tender our displeasure. And we further will that publication of this our command be made by order from the bishops, through all the parish churches of their several dioceses respectively.

Given at our palace of Westminster, the eighteenth day of October, in the ninth year of our reign.

God save the king.

Chapter I.
Of the Holy Scripture.


I. Although the light of nature and the works of creation and providence do so far manifest the goodness, wisdom, and power of God, as to leave men inexcusable;(a) yet are they not sufficient to give that knowledge of God and of His will, which is necessary unto salvation.(b) Therefore it pleased the Lord, at sundry times, and in divers manners, to reveal Himself, and to declare that His will unto His Church;(c) and afterwards, for the better preserving and propagating of the truth, and for the more sure establishment and comfort of the Church against the corruption of the flesh, and the malice of Satan and of the world, to commit the same wholly unto writing:(d) which makes the Holy Scripture to be most necessary;(e) those former ways of Gods revealing His will unto His people being now ceased.(f)

(a) Rome. 2:14, 15; Rome. 1:19, 20; Ps. 19:1, 2, 3; Rome. 1:32, with chap. 2:1.
(b) I Cor. 1:21; I Cor. 2:13, 14.
(c) Hob. 1:1.
(d) Prove. 22:19, 20, 21; Luke 1:3, 4; Rome. 15:4; Matt. 4:4, 7, 10; Isa. 8:19, 20.
(e) II Tim. 3:15; II Pet. 1:19.
(f) Hob. 1:1, 2.

II. Under the name of Holy Scripture, or the Word of God written, are now contained all the books of the Old and New Testament, which are these:

Of the Old Testament:

Genesis
Exodus
Leviticus
Numbers
Deuteronomy
Joshua
Judges
Ruth
I. Samuel
II. Samuel
I. Kings
II. Kings
I. Chronicles
II. Chronicles
Ezra
Nehemiah
Esther
Job
Psalms
Proverbs
Ecclesiastic
The Song of Songs
Isaiah
Jeremiah
Lamentations
Ezekiel
Daniel
Hose
Joel
Amos
Obadiah
Jonah
Micah
Nahum
Habakkuk
Zephaniah
Haggai
Zechariah
Malachi

Of the New Testament:

The Gospels according to
Matthew
Mark
Luke
John
The Acts of the Apostles
Pauls Epistles
To the Romans
Corinthians I.
Corinthians II.
Galatians
Ephesians
Philippians
Colossians
Thessalonians I.
Thessalonians II.
To Timothy I.
To Timothy II.
To Titus
To Philemon
The Epistle to the Hebrews
The Epistle of James
The first and second Epistles of Peter
The first, second, and third Epistles of John
The Epistle of Jude
The Revelation of John

All which are given by inspiration of God, to be the rule of faith and life.(g)

(g) Luke 16:29, 31; Eph. 2:20; Rev. 22:18, 19; II Tim. 3:16.

III. The books commonly called Apocrypha, not being of divine inspiration, are no part of the canon of the Scripture; and therefore are of no authority in the Church of God, nor to be any otherwise approved, or made use of, than other human writings.(h)

(h) Luke 24:27, 44; Rome. 3:2; II Pet. 1:21.

IV. The authority of the Holy Scripture, for which it ought to be believed and obeyed, depends not upon the testimony of any man, or Church; but wholly upon God (who is truth itself) the author thereof: and therefore it is to be received because it is the Word of God.(i)

(i) II Pet. 1:19, 21; II Tim. 3:16; I John 5:9; I Thess. 2:13.

V. We may be moved and induced by the testimony of the Church to a high and reverent esteem of the Holy Scripture.(k) And the heavenliness of the matter, the efficacy of the doctrine, the majesty of the style, the consent of all the parts, the scope of the whole (which is, to give all glory to God), the full discovery it makes of the only way of mans salvation, the many other incomparable excellencies, and the entire perfection thereof, are arguments whereby it doth abundantly evidence itself to be the Word of God: yet notwithstanding, our full persuasion and assurance of the infallible truth and divine authority thereof, is from the inward work of the Holy Spirit bearing witness by and with the Word in our hearts.(l)

(k) I Tim. 3:15.
(l) I John 2:20, 27; John 16:13, 14; I Cor. 2:10, 11, 12; Isa. 59:21.

VI. The whole counsel of God concerning all things necessary for His own glory, mans salvation, faith, and life, is either expressly set down in Scripture, or by good and necessary consequence may be deduced from Scripture: unto which nothing at any time is to be added, whether by new revelations of the Spirit, or traditions of men.(m) Nevertheless we acknowledge the inward illumination of the Spirit of God to be necessary for the saving understanding of such things as are revealed in the Word:(n) and that there are some circumstances concerning the worship of God, and government of the Church, common to human actions and societies, which are to be ordered by the light of nature and Christian prudence, according to the general rules of the Word, which are always to be observed.(o)

(m) II Tim. 3:15, 16, 17; Gal. 1:8, 9; II Thess. 2:2.
(n) John 6:45, I Cor. 2:9 to 12.
(o) I Cor. 11:13, 14; I Cor. 14:26, 40.

VII. All things in Scripture are not alike plain in themselves, nor alike clear unto all:(p) yet those things which are necessary to be known, believed, and observed for salvation, are so clearly propounded and opened in some place of Scripture or other, that not only the learned, but the unlearned, in a due use of the ordinary means, may attain unto a sufficient understanding of them.(q)

(p) II Pet. 3:16.
(q) Psalm 119:105, 130.

VIII. The Old Testament in Hebrew (which was the native language of the people of God of old), and the New Testament in Greek (which, at the time of the writing of it was most generally known to the nations), being immediately inspired by God, and, by His singular care and providence kept pure in all ages, are therefore authentical;(r) so as, in all controversies of religion, the Church is finally to appeal unto them.(s) But, because these original tongues are not known to all the people of God, who have right unto, and interest in the Scriptures, and are commanded, in the fear of God, to read and search them,(t) therefore they are to be translated into the vulgar language of every nation unto which they come,(u) that the Word of God dwelling plentifully in all, they may worship Him in an acceptable manner;(w) and, through patience and comfort of the Scriptures, may have hope.(x)

(r) Matt. 5:18.
(s) Isa. 8:20; Acts 15:15; John 5:39, 46.
(t) John 5:39.
(u) I Cor. 14:6, 9, 11, 12, 24, 27, 28.
(w) Col. 3:16.
(x) Rome. 15:4.

IX. The infallible rule of interpretation of Scripture is the Scripture itself: and therefore, when there is a question about the true and full sense of any Scripture (which is not manifold, but one), it must be searched and known by other places that speak more clearly.(y)

(y) II Pet. 1:20, 21; Acts 15:15, 16.

X. The supreme judge by which all controversies of religion are to be determined, and all decrees of councils, opinions of ancient writers, doctrines of men, and private spirits, are to be examined; and in whose sentence we are to rest; can be no other but the Holy Spirit speaking in the Scripture.(z)

(z) Matt. 22:29, 31; Eph. 2:20 with Acts 28:25.

Chapter II.
Of God, and of the Holy Trinity.


I. There is but one only,(a) living, and true God:(b) who is infinite in being and perfection,(c) a most pure spirit,(d) invisible,(e) without body, parts,(f) or passions,(g) immutable,(h) immense,(i) eternal,(k) incomprehensible,(l) almighty,(m) most wise,(n) most holy,(o) most free,(p) most absolute,(q) working all things according to the counsel of His own immutable and most righteous will,(r) for His own glory;(s) most loving,(t) gracious, merciful, long-suffering, abundant in goodness and truth, forgiving iniquity, transgression, and sin;(u) the rewarder of them that diligently seek Him;(w) and withal, most just and terrible in His judgments,(x) hating all sin,(y) and who will by no means clear the guilty.(z)

(a) Deuteronomy. 6:4; I Cor. 8:4, 6.
(b) I Thess. 1:9; Jar. 10:10.
(c) Job 11:7, 8, 9; Job 26:14.
(d) John 4:24.
(e) I Tim. 1:17.
(f) Deuteronomy. 4:15, 16; John 4:24, with Luke 24:39.
(g) Acts 14:11, 15.
(h) James 1:17; Mal. 3:6.
(i) I Kings 8:27; Jar. 23:23, 24.
(k) Ps. 90:2; I Tim. 1:17.
(l) Ps. 145:3.
(m) Gen. 17:1; Rev. 4:8.
(n) Rome. 16:27.
(o) Isa. 6:3; Rev. 4:8.
(p) Ps. 115:3.
(q) Exod. 3:14.
(r) Eph. 1:11.
(s) Prove. 16:4; Rome. 11:36.
(t) I John 4:8, 16.
(u) Exod. 34:6, 7.
(w) Hob. 11:6.
(x) Neh. 9:32, 33.
(y) Ps. 5:5, 6.
(z) Nah. 1:2, 3; Exod. 34:7.

II. God hath all life,(a) glory,(b) goodness,(c) blessedness,(d) in and of Himself; and is alone in and unto Himself all-sufficient, not standing in need of any creatures which He hath made,(e) nor deriving any glory from them,(f) but only manifesting His own glory in, by, unto, and upon them: He is the alone fountain of all being, of whom, through whom, and to whom are all things;(g) and hath most sovereign dominion over them, to do by them, for them, or upon them whatsoever Himself pleases.(h) In His sight all things are open and manifest;(i) His knowledge is infinite, infallible, and independent upon the creature,(k) so as nothing is to Him contingent, or uncertain.(l) He is most holy in all His counsels, in all His works, and in all His commands.(m) To Him is due from angels and men, and every other creature, whatsoever worship, service, or obedience He is pleased to require of them.(n)

(a) John 5:26.
(b) Acts 7:2.
(c) Ps. 119:68.
(d) I Tim. 6:15; Rome. 9:5.
(e) Acts 17:24, 25.
(f) Job 22:2, 3.
(g) Rome 11:36.
(h) Rev. 4:11; I Tim. 6:15; Dan. 4:25, 35.
(i) Hob. 4:13.
(k) Rome. 11:33, 34; Ps. 147:5.
(l) Acts 15:18; Ezek. 11:5.
(m) Ps. 145:17; Rome. 7:12.
(n) Rev. 5:12, 13, 14.

III. In the unity of the Godhood there be three persons, of one substance, power, and eternity; God the Father, God the Son, and God the Holy Ghost.(o) The Father is of none, neither begotten, nor proceeding: the Son is eternally begotten of the Father:(p) the Holy Ghost eternally proceeding from the Father and the Son.(q)

(o) I John 5:7; Matt. 3:16, 17; Matt. 28:19; II Cor. 13:14.
(p) John 1:14, 18.
(q) John 15:26; Gal. 4:6.

Chapter III.
Of Gods Eternal Decree.


I. God from all eternity did, by the most wise and holy counsel of His own will, freely, and unchangeably ordain whatsoever comes to pass:(a) yet so, as thereby neither is God the author of sin,(b) nor is violence offered to the will of the creatures, nor is the liberty or contingency of second causes taken away, but rather established.(c)

(a) Eph. 1:11; Rome. 11:33; Hob. 6:17; Rome. 9:15, 18.
(b) Jam. 1:13, 17; I John 1:5.
(c) Acts 2:23; Matt. 17:12; Acts 4:27, 28; John 19:11; Prove. 16:33.

II. Although God knows whatsoever may or can come to pass upon all supposed conditions,(d) yet hath He not decreed anything because He foresaw it as future, or as that which would come to pass upon such conditions.(e)

(d) Acts 15:18; I Sam. 23:11, 12; Matt. 11:21, 23.
(e) Rome. 9:11, 13, 16, 18.

III. By the decree of God, for the manifestation of His glory, some men and angels(f) are predestined unto everlasting life, and others fore-ordained to everlasting death.(g)

(f) I Tim. 5:21; Matt. 25:41.
(g) Rome. 9:22, 23; Eph. 1:5, 6; Prove. 16:4.

IV. These angels and men, thus predestined, and fore-ordained, are particularly and unchangeably designed, and their number so certain and definite, that it cannot be either increased or diminished.(h)

(h) II Tim. 2:19; John 13:18.

V. Those of mankind that are predestined unto life, God, before the foundation of the world was laid, according to His eternal and immutable purpose, and the secret counsel and good pleasure of His will, hath chosen, in Christ, unto everlasting glory,(i) out of His mere free grace and love, without any foresight of faith or good works, or perseverance in either of them, or any other thing in the creature, as conditions, or causes moving Him thereunto:(k) and all to the praise of His glorious grace.(l)

(i) Eph. 1:4, 9, 11; Rome. 8:30; II Tim. 1:9; I Thess. 5:9.
(k) Rome. 9:11, 13, 16; Eph. 1:4, 9.
(l) Eph. 1:6, 12.

VI. As God hath appointed the elect unto glory, so hath He, by the eternal and most free purpose of His will, fore-ordained all the means thereunto.(m) Wherefore they who are elected, being fallen in Adam, are redeemed by Christ,(n) are effectually called unto faith in Christ by His Spirit working in due season, are justified, adopted, sanctified,(o) and kept by His power through faith, unto salvation.(p) Neither are any other redeemed by Christ, effectually called, justified, adopted, sanctified, and saved, but the elect only.(q)

(m) I Pet. 1:2; Eph. 1:4, 5; Eph. 2:10; II Thess. 2:13.
(n) I Thess. 5:9, 10; Titus 2:14.
(o) Rome. 8:30; Eph. 1:5; II Thess. 2:13.
(p) I Pet. 1:5.
(q) John 17:9; Rome. 8:28 to the end; John 6:64, 65; John 10:26; John 8:47; I John 2:19.

VII. The rest of mankind God was pleased, according to the unsearchable counsel of His own will, whereby He extends or withholds mercy, as He pleases, for the glory of His sovereign power over His creatures, to pass by; and to ordain them to dishonour and wrath, for their sin, to the praise of His glorious justice.(r)

(r) Matt. 11:25, 26; Rome. 9:17, 18, 21, 22; II Tim. 2:19, 20; Jude ver. 4; I Pet. 2:8.

VIII. The doctrine of this high mystery of predestination is to be handled with special prudence and care,(s) that men attending the will of God revealed in His Word, and yielding obedience thereunto, may, from the certainty of their effectual vocation, be assured of their eternal election.(t) So shall this doctrine afford matter of praise, reverence, and admiration of God,(u) and of humility, diligence, and abundant consolation to all that sincerely obey the Gospel.(w)

(s) Rome. 9:20; Rome. 11:33; Deuteronomy. 29:29.
(t) II Pet. 1:10.
(u) Eph. 1:6; Rome. 11:33.
(w) Rome. 11:5, 6, 20; II Pet. 1:10; Rome. 8:33; Luke 10:20.

Chapter IV.
Of Creation.


I. It pleased God the Father, Son, and Holy Ghost,(a) for the manifestation of the glory of His eternal power, wisdom, and goodness,(b) in the beginning, to create, or make of nothing, the world, and all things therein whether visible or invisible, in the space of six days; and all very good.(c)

(a) Hob. 1:2; John 1:2, 3; Gen. 1:2; Job. 26:13; Job. 33:4.
(b) Rome. 1:20; Jar. 10:12; Ps. 104:24; Ps. 33:5, 6.
(c) Gen. 1 chap.; Hob. 11:3; Col. 1:16; Acts 17:24.

II. After God had made all other creatures, He created man, male and female,(d) with reasonable and immortal souls,(e) endued with knowledge, righteousness, and true holiness, after His own image;(f) having the law of God written in their hearts,(g) and power to fulfil it:(h) and yet under a possibility of transgressing, being left to the liberty of their own will, which was subject unto change.(i) Beside this law written in their hearts, they received a command, not to eat of the tree of the knowledge of good and evil, which while they kept, they were happy in their communion with God,(k) and had dominion over the creatures.(l)

(d) Gen. 1:27.
(e) Gen. 2:7 with Eccles. 12:7 & Luke 23:43 and Matt. 10:28.
(f) Gen. 1:26; Col. 3:10; Eph. 4:24.
(g) Rome. 2:14, 15.
(h) Eccles. 7:29.
(i) Gen. 3:6; Eccles. 7:29.
(k) Gen. 2:17; Gen. 3:8, 9, 10, 11, 23.
(l) Gen. 1:26, 28.

Chapter V.
Of Providence.

I. God the great Creator of all things doth uphold,(a) direct, dispose, and govern all creatures, actions, and things,(b) from the greatest even to the least,(c) by His most wise and holy providence,(d) according to His infallible fore-knowledge,(e) and the free and immutable counsel of His own will,(f) to the praise of the glory of His wisdom, power, justice, goodness, and mercy.(g)

(a) Hob. 1:3.
(b) Dan. 4:34, 35; Ps. 135:6; Acts 17:25, 26, 28; Job 38 to 41 chapters.
(c) Matt. 10:29, 30, 31.
(d) Prove. 15:3; Ps. 104:24; Ps. 145:17.
(e) Acts 15:18; Ps. 94:8, 9, 10, 11.
(f) Eph. 1:11; Ps. 33:10, 11.
(g) Isa. 63:14; Eph. 3:10; Rome. 9:17; Gen. 45:7; Ps. 145:7.

II. Although, in relation to the fore-knowledge and decree of God, the first Cause, all things come to pass immutably, and infallibly:(h) yet, by the same providence, He orders them to fall out, according to the nature of second causes, either necessarily, freely, or contingently.(i)

(h) Acts 2:23.
(i) Gen. 8:22; Jar. 31:35; Exod. 21:13 with Deuteronomy. 19:5; I Kings 22:28, 34; Isa. 10:6, 7.

III. God in His ordinary providence makes use of means,(k) yet is free to work without,(l) above,(m) and against them at His pleasure.(n)

(k) Acts 27:31, 44; Isa. 55:10, 11; Hos. 2:21, 22.
(l) Hos. 1:7; Matt. 4:4; Job 34:20.
(m) Rome. 4:19, 20, 21.
(n) II Kings 6:6; Dan. 3:27.

IV. The almighty power, unsearchable wisdom, and infinite goodness of God so far manifest themselves in His providence, that it extends itself even to the first fall, and all other sins of angels and men;(o) and that not by a bare permission,(p) but such as hath joined with it a most wise and powerful bounding,(q) and otherwise ordering and governing of them, in a manifold dispensation, to His own holy ends;(r) yet so, as the sinfulness thereof proceeds only from the creature, and not from God, who, being most holy and righteous, neither is, nor can be, the author or approver of sin.(s)

(o) Rome. 11:32, 33, 34; II Sam. 24:1 with I Chron. 21:1; I Kings 22:22, 23; I Chron. 10:4, 13, 14; II Sam. 16:10; Acts 2:23; Acts 4:27, 28.
(p) Acts 14:16.
(q) Ps. 76:10; II Kings 19:28.
(r) Gen. 50:20; Isa. 10:6, 7, 12.
(s) James 1:13, 14, 17; I John 2:16; Ps. 50:21.

V. The most wise, righteous, and gracious God doth oftentimes leave for a season His own children to manifold temptations, and the corruption of their own hearts, to chastise them for their former sins, or to discover unto them the hidden strength of corruption, and deceitfulness of their hearts, that they may be humbled;(t) and, to raise them to a more close and constant dependence for their support upon Himself, and to make them more watchful against all future occasions of sin, and for sundry other just and holy ends.(u)

(t) II Chron. 32:25, 26, 31; II Sam. 24:1.
(u) II Cor. 12:7, 8, 9; Ps. 73 throughout; Ps. 77:1 to 12; Mark 14:66 to the end, with John 21:15, 16, 17.

VI. As for those wicked and ungodly men whom God, as a righteous Judge, for former sins, doth blind and harden,(w) from them He not only withholds His grace, whereby they might have been enlightened in their understandings, and wrought upon in their hearts;(x) but sometimes also withdraws the gifts which they had,(y) and exposes them to such objects as their corruption makes occasions of sin;(z) and, withal, gives them over to their own lusts, the temptations of the world, and the power of Satan:(a) whereby it comes to pass that they harden themselves, even under those means which God uses for the softening of others.(b)

(w) Rome. 1:24, 26, 28; Rome. 11:7, 8.
(x) Deuteronomy. 29:4.
(y) Matt. 13:12; Matt. 25:29.
(z) Deuteronomy. 2:30; II Kings 8:12, 13.
(a) Ps. 81:11, 12; II Thess. 2:10, 11, 12.
(b) Exod. 7:3 with Exod. 8:15, 32; II Cor. 2:15, 16; Isa. 8:14; I Pet. 2:7, 8; Isa. 6:9, 10 with Acts 28:26, 27.

VII. As the providence of God doth in general reach to all creatures, so after a most special manner, it takes care of His Church, and disposes all things to the good thereof.(c)

(c) I Tim. 4:10; Amos 9:8, 9; Rome. 8:28; Isa. 43:3, 4, 5, 14.

Chapter VI.
Of the Fall of Man, of Sin, and of the Punishment thereof.


I. Our first parents, being seduced by the subtlety and temptation of Satan, sinned, in eating the forbidden fruit.(a) This their sin God was pleased, according to His wise and holy counsel, to permit, having purposed to order it to His own glory.(b)

(a) Gen. 3:13; II Cor. 11:3.
(b) Rome. 11:32.

II. By this sin they fell from their original righteousness and communion, with God,(c) and so became dead in sin,(d) and wholly defiled in all the parts and faculties of soul and body.(e)

(c) Gen. 3:6, 7, 8; Eccles. 7:29; Rome. 3:23.
(d) Gen. 2:17; Eph. 2:1.
(e) Tit. 1:15; Gen. 6:5; Jar. 17:9; Rome. 3:10 to 19.

III. They being the root of all mankind, the guilt of this sin was imputed,(f) and the same death in sin and corrupted nature conveyed, to all their posterity descending from them by ordinary generation.(g)

(f) Gen. 1:27, 28 & Gen. 2:16, 17 and Acts 17:26 with Rome. 5:12, 15, 16, 17, 18, 19 and I Cor. 15:21, 22, 49.
(g) Ps. 51:5; Gen. 5:3; Job 14:4, Job 15:14.

IV. From this original corruption, whereby we are utterly indisposed, disabled, and made opposite to all good,(h) and wholly inclined to all evil,(i) do proceed all actual transgressions.(k)

(h) Rome. 5:6; Rome. 8:7, Rome. 7:18; Col. 1:21.
(i) Gen. 6:5; Gen. 8:21; Rome. 3:10, 11, 12.
(k) James 1:14, 15; Eph. 2:2, 3; Matt. 15:19.

V. This corruption of nature, during this life, doth remain in those that are regenerated;(l) and although it be, through Christ, pardoned and mortified, yet both itself and all the motions thereof are truly and properly sin.(m)

(l) I John 1:8, 10; Rome. 7:14, 17, 18, 23; James 3:2; Prove. 20:9; Eccles. 7:20.
(m) Rome. 7:5, 7, 8, 25; Gal. 5:17.

VI. Every sin, both original and actual, being a transgression of the righteous law of God, and contrary thereunto,(n) doth, in its own nature, bring guilt upon the sinner;(o) whereby he is bound over to the wrath of God,(p) and curse of the law,(q) and so made subject to death,(r) with all miseries spiritual,(s) temporal,(t) and eternal.(u)

(n) I John 3:4.
(o) Rome. 2:15; Rome. 3:9, 19.
(p) Ephes. 2:3.
(q) Gal. 3:10.
(r) Rome. 6:23.
(s) Ephes. 4:18.
(t) Rome. 8:20; Lam. 3:39.
(u) Matt. 25:41, II Thess. 1:9.

Chapter VII.
Of Gods Covenant with Man.


I. The distance between God and the creature is go great, that although reasonable creatures do owe obedience unto Him as their Creator, yet they could never have any fruition of Him as their blessedness and reward, but by some voluntary condescension on Gods part, which He hath been pleased to express by way of covenant.(a)

(a) Isa. 40:13, 14, 15, 16, 17; Job. 9:32, 33; I Sam. 2:25; Ps. 113:5, 6; Ps. 100:2, 3; Job. 22:2, 3; Job 35:7, 8; Luke 17:10; Acts 17:24, 25.

II. The first covenant made with man was a covenant of works,(b) wherein life was promised to Adam, and in him to his posterity,(c) upon condition of perfect and personal obedience.(d)

(b) Gal. 3:12.
(c) Rome. 10:5, Rome. 5:12 to 20.
(d) Gen. 2:17; Gal. 3:10.

III. Man by his fall having made himself incapable of life by that covenant, the Lord was pleased to make a second,(e) commonly called the covenant of grace; wherein He freely offers unto sinners life and salvation by Jesus Christ, requiring of them faith in Him, that they may be saved,(f) and promising to give unto all those that are ordained unto life His Holy Spirit, to make them willing and able to believe.(g)

(e) Gal. 3:21; Rome. 8:3; Rome. 3:20, 21; Gen. 3:15; Isa. 42:6.
(f) Mark 16:15, 16; John 3:16; Rome. 10:6, 9; Gal. 3:11.
(g) Ezek. 36:26, 27; John 6:44, 45.

IV. This covenant of grace is frequently set forth in Scripture by the name of a Testament, in reference to the death of Jesus Christ the Testator, and to the everlasting inheritance, with all things belonging to it, therein bequeathed.(h)

(h) Hob. 9:15, 16, 17; Hob. 7:22; Luke 22:20; I Cor. 11:25.

V. This covenant was differently administered in the time of the law, and in the time of the gospel:(i) under the law, it was administered by promises, prophecies, sacrifices, circumcision, the paschal lamb, and other types and ordinances delivered to the people of the Jews, all fore-signifying Christ to come:(k) which were, for that time, sufficient and efficacious, through the operation of the Spirit, to instruct and build up the elect in faith in the promised Messiah,(l) by whom they had full remission of sins, and eternal salvation; and is called, the Old Testament.(m)

(i) II Cor. 3:6, 7, 8, 9.
(k) Hob. 8, 9, 10 chapters; Rome. 4:11; Col. 2:11, 12; I Cor. 5:7.
(l) I Cor. 10:1, 2, 3, 4; Hob. 11:13; John 8:56.
(m) Gal. 3:7, 8, 9, 14.

VI. Under the gospel, when Christ, the substance,(n) was exhibited, the ordinances in which this covenant is dispensed are the preaching of the Word, and the administration of the sacraments of Baptism and the Lords Supper:(o) which, though fewer in number, and administered with more simplicity, and less outward glory; yet, in them, it is held forth in more fullness, evidence, and spiritual efficacy,(p) to all nations, both Jews and Gentiles;(q) and is called the New Testament.(r) There are not therefore two covenants of grace, differing in substance, but one and the same, under various dispensations.(s)

(n) Col. 2:17.
(o) Matt. 28:19, 20; I Cor. 11:23, 24, 25.
(p) Hob. 12:22 to 28; Jar. 31:33, 34.
(q) Matt. 28:19; Eph. 2:15, 16, 17, 18, 19.
(r) Luke 22:20.
(s) Gal. 3:14, 16; Rome 3:21, 22, 23, 30; Ps. 32:1 with Rome. 4:3, 6, 16, 17, 23, 24; Hob. 13:8; Acts 15:11.

Chapter VIII.
Of Christ the Mediator.


I. It pleased God, in His eternal purpose, to choose and ordain the Lord Jesus, His only begotten Son, to be the Mediator between God and man;(a) the Prophet,(b) Priest,(c) and King,(d) the Head and Saviour of His Church,(e) the Heir of all things,(f) and Judge of the world:(g) unto whom He did from all eternity give a people, to be His seed,(h) and to be by Him in time redeemed, called, justified, sanctified, and glorified.(i)

(a) Isa. 42:1; I Pet. 19, 20; John 3:16; I Tim. 2:5.
(b) Acts 3:22.
(c) Hob. 5:5, 6.
(d) Ps. 2:6; Luke 1:33.
(e) Eph. 5:23.
(f) Hob. 1:2.
(g) Acts 17:31.
(h) John 17:6; Ps. 22:30, Isa. 53:10.
(i) I Tim. 2:6; Isa. 55:4, 5; I Cor. 1:30.

II. The Son of God, the second person in the Trinity, being very and eternal God, of one substance and equal with the Father, did, when the fullness of time was come, take upon Him mans nature,(k) with all the essential properties and common infirmities thereof, yet without sin:(l) being conceived by the power of the Holy Ghost, in the womb of the virgin Mary, of her substance.(m) So that two whole, perfect, and distinct natures, the Godhood and the manhood, were inseparably joined together in one person, without conversion, composition, or confusion.(n) Which person is very God, and very man, yet one Christ, the only Mediator between God and man.(o)

(k) John 1:1, 14; I John 5:20; Phil. 2:6; Gal. 4:4.
(l) Hob. 2:14, 16, 17; Hob. 4:15.
(m) Luke 1:27, 31, 35; Gal. 4:4.
(n) Luke 1:35; Col. 2:9; Rome. 9:5; I Pet. 3:18; I Tim. 3:16.
(o) Rome. 1:3, 4; I Tim. 2:5.

III. The Lord Jesus, in His human nature thus united to the divine, was sanctified and anointed with the Holy Spirit, above measure,(p) having in Him all the treasures of wisdom and knowledge;(q) in whom it pleased the Father that all fullness should dwell;(r) to the end that, being holy, harmless, undefiled, and full of grace and truth,(s) He might be thoroughly furnished to execute the office of a mediator and surety.(t) Which office He took not unto Himself, but was thereunto called by His Father,(u) who put all power and judgment into His hand, and gave Him commandment to execute the same.(w)

(p) Ps. 45:7; John 3:34.
(q) Col. 2:3.
(r) Col. 1:19.
(s) Hob. 7:26; John 1:14.
(t) Acts 10:38; Hob. 12:24; Hob. 7:22.
(u) Hob. 5:4, 5.
(w) John 5:22, 27; Matt. 28:18; Acts 2:36.

IV. This office the Lord Jesus did most willingly undertake;(x) which that He might discharge, He was made under the law,(y) and did perfectly fulfil it,(z) endured most grievous torments immediately in His soul,(a) and most painful sufferings in His body;(b) was crucified, and died;(c) was buried, and remained under the power of death; yet saw no corruption.(d) On the third day He arose from the dead,(e) with the same body in which He suffered,(f) with which also he ascended into heaven, and there sits at the right hand of His Father,(g) making intercession,(h) and shall return to judge men and angels at the end of the world.(i)

(x) Ps. 40:7, 8 with Hob. 10:5 to 10; John 10:18; Phil. 2:8.
(y) Gal. 4:4.
(z) Matt. 3:15; Matt. 5:17.
(a) Matt. 26:37, 38; Luke 22:44; Matt. 27:46.
(b) Matt. 26, 27 chapters.
(c) Phil. 2:8.
(d) Acts. 2:23, 24, 27; Acts 13:37; Rome. 6:9.
(e) I Cor. 15:3, 4.
(f) John 20:25, 27.
(g) Mark 16:19.
(h) Rome. 8:34; Hob. 9:24; Hob. 7:25.
(i) Rome. 14:9, 10; Acts 1:11; Acts 10:42; Matt. 13:40, 41, 42; Jude ver. 6; II Pet. 2:4.

V. The Lord Jesus, by His perfect obedience, and sacrifice of Himself, which He, through the eternal Spirit, once offered up unto God, hath fully satisfied the justice of His Father;(k) and purchased, not only reconciliation, but an everlasting inheritance in the kingdom of heaven, for all those whom the Father hath given unto Him.(l)

(k) Rome. 5:19; Hob. 9:14, 16; Hob. 10:14; Eph. 5:2; Rome. 3:25, 26.
(l) Dan. 9:24, 26; Col. 1:19, 20; Eph. 1:11, 14; John 17:2; Hob. 9:12, 15.

VI. Although the work of redemption was not actually wrought by Christ till after His incarnation, yet the virtue, efficacy, and benefits thereof were communicated unto the elect in all ages successively from the beginning of the world, in and by those promises, types, and sacrifices, wherein He was revealed, and signified to be the seed of the woman which should bruise the serpents head; and the Lamb slain from the beginning of the world: being yesterday and to-day the same, and forever.(m)

(m) Gal. 4:4, 5; Gen. 3:15; Rev. 13:8; Hob. 13:8.

VII. Christ, in the work of mediation, acts according to both natures, by each nature doing that which is proper to itself:(n) yet, by reason of the unity of the person, that which is proper to one nature, is sometimes in Scripture attributed to the person denominated by the other nature.(o)

(n) Hob. 9:14; I Pet. 3:18.
(o) Acts 20:28; John 3:13; I John 3:16.

VIII. To all those for whom Christ hath purchased redemption, He doth certainly and effectually apply and communicate the same,(p) making intercession for them,(q) and revealing unto them, in and by the Word, the mysteries of salvation,(r) effectually persuading them by His Spirit to believe and obey, and governing their hearts by His Word and Spirit;(s) overcoming all their enemies by His almighty power and wisdom, in such manner, and ways, as are most consonant to His wonderful and unsearchable dispensation.(t)

(p) John 6:37, 39; John 10:15, 16.
(q) I John 2:1, 2; Rome. 8:34.
(r) John 15:13, 15; Eph. 1:7, 8, 9; John 17:6.
(s) John 14:26; Hob. 12:2; II Cor. 4:13; Rome. 8:9, 14; Rome. 15:18, 19; John 17:17.
(t) Ps. 110:1; I Cor. 15:25, 26; Mal. 4:2, 3; Col. 2:15.

Chapter IX.
Of Free Will.


I. God hath endued the will of man with that natural liberty, that is neither forced, nor by any absolute necessity of nature determined to good or evil.(a)

(a) Matt. 17:12; James 1:14; Deuteronomy. 30:19.

II. Man, in his state of innocence, had freedom and power to will and to do that which was good, and well pleasing to God;(b) but yet, mutably, so that he might fall from it.(c)

(b) Eccles. 7:29; Gen. 1:26.
(c) Gen. 2:16, 17; Gen. 3:6.

III. Man, by his fall into a state of sin, hath wholly lost all ability of will to any spiritual good accompanying salvation:(d) so as, a natural man, being altogether averse from that good,(e) and dead in sin,(f) is not able, by his own strength, to convert himself, or to prepare himself thereunto.(g)

(d) Rome. 5:6; Rome 8:7; John 15:5.
(e) Rome. 3:10, 12.
(f) Eph. 2:1, 5; Col. 2:13.
(g) John 6:44, 65; Eph. 2:2, 3, 4, 5; I Cor. 2:14; Titus 3:3, 4, 5.

IV. When God converts a sinner, and translates him into the state of grace, He freeth him from his natural bondage under sin;(h) and, by His grace alone, enables him freely to will and to do that which is spiritually good;(i) yet so, as that by reason of his remaining corruption, he doth not perfectly, nor only, will that which is good, but doth also will that which is evil.(k)

(h) Col. 1:13; John 8:34, 36.
(i) Phil. 2:13; Rome. 6:18, 22.
(k) Gal. 5:17; Rome. 7:15, 18, 19, 21, 23.

V. The will of man is made perfectly and immutably free to do good alone, in the state of glory only.(l)

(l) Eph. 4:13; Hob. 12:23; I John 3:2; Jude ver. 24.

Chapter X.
Of Effectual Calling.


I. All those whom God hath predestined unto life, and those only, He is pleased in His appointed and accepted time effectually to call,(a) by His Word and Spirit,(b) out of that state of sin and death, in which they are by nature, to grace and salvation by Jesus Christ;(c) enlightening their minds spiritually and savingly to understand the things of God,(d) taking away their heart of stone, and giving unto them a heart of flesh;(e) renewing their wills, and, by His almighty power determining them to that which is good,(f) and effectually drawing them to Jesus Christ:(g) yet so, as they come most freely, being made willing by His grace.(h)

(a) Rome. 8:30; Rome. 11:7; Eph. 1:10, 11.
(b) II Thess. 2:13, 14; II Cor. 3:3, 6.
(c) Rome. 8:2; Eph. 2:1, 2, 3, 4, 5; II Tim. 1:9, 10.
(d) Acts 26:18; I Cor. 2:10, 12; Eph. 1:17, 18.
(e) Ezek. 36:26.
(f) Ezek. 11:19; Phil. 2:13; Deuteronomy. 30:6; Ezek. 36:27.
(g) Eph. 1:19; John 6:44, 45.
(h) Cant. 1:4; Ps. 110:3; John 6:37; Rome. 6:16, 17, 18.

II. This effectual call is of Gods free and special grace alone, not from anything at all foreseen in man,(i) who is altogether passive therein, until being quickened and renewed by the Holy Spirit,(k) he is thereby enabled to answer this call, and to embrace the grace offered and conveyed in it.(l)

(i) II Tim. 1:9; Tit. 3:4, 5; Eph. 2:4, 5, 8, 9; Rome. 9:11.
(k) I Cor. 2:14; Rome. 8:7; Eph. 2:5.
(l) John 6:37; Ezek. 36:27; John 5:25.

III. Elect infants, dying in infancy, are regenerated, and saved by Christ through the Spirit,(m) who works when, and where, and how He pleases:(n) so also, are all other elect persons who are incapable of being outwardly called by the ministry of the Word.(o)

(m) Luke 18:15, 16, and Acts 2:38, 39 and John 3:3, 5 and I John 5:12 & Rome. 8:9 compared.
(n) John 3:8.
(o) I John 5:12; Acts 4:12.

IV. Others, not elected, although they may be called by the ministry of the Word,(p) and may have some common operations of the Spirit,(q) yet they never truly come unto Christ, and therefore cannot be saved:(r) much less can men, not professing the Christian religion, be saved in any other way whatsoever, be they never so diligent to frame their lives according to the light of nature, and the law of that religion they do profess.(s) And to assert and maintain that they may, is very pernicious, and to be detested.(t)

(p) Matt. 22:14.
(q) Matt. 7:22; Matt. 13:20, 21; Hob. 6:4, 5.
(r) John 6:64, 65, 66; John 8:24.
(s) Acts 4:12; John 14:6; Eph. 2:12; John 4:22; John 17:3.
(t) II John ver. 9, 10, 11; I Cor. 16:22; Gal. 1:6, 7, 8.

Chapter XI.
Of Justification.


I. Those whom God effectually calls, He also freely justifies;(a) not by infusing righteousness into them, but by pardoning their sins, and by accounting and accepting their persons as righteous, not for anything wrought in them, or done by them, but for Christs sake alone; nor by imputing faith itself, the act of believing, or any other evangelical obedience to them, as their righteousness, but by imputing the obedience and satisfaction of Christ unto them,(b) they receiving and resting on Him and His righteousness by faith; which faith they have not of themselves, it is the gift of God.(c)

(a) Rome. 8:30; Rome. 3:24.
(b) Rome. 4:5, 6, 7, 8; II Cor. 5:19, 21; Rome. 3:22, 24, 25, 27, 28; Tit. 3:5, 7; Eph. 1:7; Jar. 23:6; I Cor. 1:30, 31; Rome. 5:17, 18, 19.
(c) Acts 10:43; Gal. 2:16; Phil. 3:19; Acts 13:38, 39; Eph. 2:7, 8.

II. Faith, thus receiving and resting on Christ and His righteousness, is the alone instrument of justification;(d) yet is it not alone in the person justified, but is ever accompanied with all other saving graces, and is no dead faith, but works by love.(e)

(d) John 1:12; Rome. 3:28; Rome. 5:1.
(e) Jam. 2:17, 22, 26; Gal. 5:6.

III. Christ, by His obedience and death, did fully discharge the debt of all those that are thus justified, and did make a proper, real, and full satisfaction to His Fathers justice in their behalf.(f) Yet, inasmuch as He was given by the Father for them;(g) and His obedience and satisfaction accepted in their stead;(h) and both freely, not for anything in them; their justification is only of free grace;(i) that both the exact justice, and rich grace of God, might be glorified in the justification of sinners.(k)

(f) Rome. 5:8, 9, 10, 19; I Tim. 2:5, 6; Hob. 10:10, 14; Dan. 9:24, 26; Isa. 53:4, 5, 6, 10, 11, 12.
(g) Rome. 8:32.
(h) II Cor. 5:21; Matt. 3:17; Eph. 5:2.
(i) Rome. 3:24; Eph. 1:7.
(k) Rome. 3:26; Eph. 2:7.

IV. God did, from all eternity, decree to justify all the elect,(l) and Christ did, in the fullness of time, die for their sins, and rise again for their justification:(m) nevertheless, they are not justified, until the Holy Spirit doth, in due time, actually apply Christ unto them.(n)

(l) Gal. 3:8; I Pet. 1:2, 19, 20; Rome. 8:30.
(m) Gal. 4:4; I Tim. 2:6; Rome. 4:25.
(n) Col. 1:21, 22; Gal. 2:16; Tit. 3:3, 4, 5, 6, 7.

V. God doth continue to forgive the sins of those that are justified:(o) and although they can never fall from the state of justification;(p) yet they may, by their sins, fall under Gods fatherly displeasure, and not have the light of His countenance restored unto them, until they humble themselves, confess their sins, beg pardon, and renew their faith and repentance.(q)

(o) Matt. 6:12; I John 1:7, 9; I John 2:1, 2.
(p) Luke 22:32; John 10:28; Hob. 10:14.
(q) Ps. 89:31, 32, 33; Ps. 51:7, 8, 9, 10, 11, 12; Ps. 32:5; Matt. 26:75; I Cor. 11:30, 32; Luke 1:20.

VI. The justification of believers under the old testament was, in all these respects, one and the same with the justification of believers under the new testament.(r)

(r) Gal. 3:9, 13, 14; Rome. 4:22, 23, 24; Hob. 13:8.

Chapter XII.
Of Adoption.


All those that are justified, God vouchsafes, in and for His only Son Jesus Christ, to make partakers of the grace of adoption:(a) by which they are taken into the number, and enjoy the liberties and privileges of the children of God,(b) have His name put upon them,(c) receive the spirit of adoption,(d) have access to the throne of grace with boldness,(e) are enabled to cry, Abba, Father,(f) are pitied,(g) protected,(h) provided for,(i) and chastened by Him as by a Father;(k) yet never cast off,(l) but sealed to the day of redemption,(m) and inherit the promises,(n) as heirs of everlasting salvation.(o)

(a) Eph. 1:5.
(b) Gal. 4:4, 5; Rome. 8:17; John 1:12.
(c) Jar. 14:9; II Cor. 6:18; Rev. 3:12.
(d) Rome. 8:15.
(e) Eph. 3:12; Rome. 5:2.
(f) Gal. 4:6.
(g) Ps. 103:13.
(h) Prove. 14:26.
(i) Matt. 6:30, 32; I Pet. 5:7.
(k) Hob. 12:6.
(l) Lam. 3:31.
(m) Eph. 4:30.
(n) Hob. 6:12.
(o) I Pet. 1:3, 4; Hob. 1:14.

Chapter XIII.
Of Sanctification.

I. They who are once effectually called and regenerated, having a new heart and a new spirit created in them, are further sanctified, really and personally, through the virtue of Christs death and resurrection,(a) by His Word and Spirit dwelling in them:(b) the dominion of the whole body of sin is destroyed,(c) and the several lusts thereof are more and more weakened and mortified;(d) and they more and more quickened and strengthened in all saving graces,(e) to the practice of true holiness, without which no man shall see the Lord.(f)

(a) I Cor. 6:11; Acts 20:32; Phil. 3:10; Rome. 6:5, 6.
(b) John 17:17; Eph. 5:26; II Thess. 2:13.
(c) Rome. 6:6, 14.
(d) Gal. 5:24; Rome. 8:13.
(e) Col. 1:11; Eph. 3:16, 17, 18, 19.
(f) II Cor. 7:1; Hob. 12:14.

II. This sanctification is throughout, in the whole man;(g) yet imperfect in this life, there abiding still some remnants of corruption in every part:(h) whence arises a continual and irreconcilable war; the flesh lusting against the Spirit, and the Spirit against the flesh.(i)

(g) I Thess. 5:23.
(h) I John 1:10; Rome. 7:18, 23; Phil. 3:12.
(i) Gal. 5:17; I Pet. 2:11.

III. In which war, although the remaining corruption, for a time, may much prevail;(k) yet through the continual supply of strength from the sanctifying Spirit of Christ, the regenerate part doth overcome;(l) and so, the saints grow in grace,(m) perfecting holiness in the fear of God.(n)

(k) Rome. 7:23.
(l) Rome. 6:14; I John 5:4; Eph. 4:15, 16.
(m) II Pet. 3:18; II Cor. 3:18.
(n) II Cor. 7:1.

Chapter XIV.
Of Saving Faith.


I. The grace of faith, whereby the elect are enabled to believe to the saving of their souls,(a) is the work of the Spirit of Christ in their hearts;(b) and is ordinarily wrought by the ministry of the Word:(c) by which also, and by the administration of the sacraments, and prayer, it is increased and strengthened.(d)

(a) Hob. 10:39.
(b) II Cor. 4:13; Eph. 1:17, 18, 19; Eph. 2:8.
(c) Rome. 10:14, 17.
(d) I Pet. 2:2; Acts 20:32; Rome. 4:11; Luke 17:5; Rome. 1:16, 17.

II. By this faith, a Christian believes to be true whatsoever is revealed in the Word, for the authority of God Himself speaking therein;(e) and acts differently upon that which each particular passage thereof contains; yielding obedience to the commands,(f) trembling at the threatenings,(g) and embracing the promises of God for this life, and that which is to come.(h) But the principal acts of saving faith are accepting, receiving, and resting upon Christ alone for justification, sanctification, and eternal life, by virtue of the covenant of grace.(i)

(e) John 4:42; I Thess. 2:13; I John 5:10; Acts 24:14.
(f) Rome. 16:26.
(g) Isa. 66:2.
(h) Hob. 11:13; I Tim. 4:8.
(i) John 1:12; Acts 16:31; Gal. 2:20; Acts 15:11.

III. This faith is different in degrees, weak or strong;(k) may be often and many ways assailed, and weakened, but gets the victory;(l) growing up in many to the attainment of a full assurance through Christ,(m) who is both the author and finisher of our faith.(n)

(k) Hob. 5:13, 14; Rome. 4:19, 20; Matt. 6:30; Matt. 8:10.
(l) Luke 22:31, 32; Eph. 6:16; I John 5:4, 5.
(m) Hob. 6:11, 12; Hob. 10:22; Col. 2:2.
(n) Hob. 12:2.

Chapter XV.
Of Repentance unto Life.


I. Repentance unto life is an evangelical grace,(a) the doctrine whereof is to be preached by every minister of the Gospel, as well as that of faith in Christ.(b)

(a) Such. 12:10; Acts 11:18.
(b) Luke 24:47; Mark 1:15; Acts 20:21.

II. By it, a sinner, out of the sight and sense not only of the danger, but also of the filthiness and odiousness of his sins, as contrary to the holy nature and righteous law of God; and upon the apprehension of his mercy in Christ to such as are penitent, so grieves for, and hates his sins, as to turn from them all unto God,(c) purposing and endeavouring to walk with Him in all the ways of His commandments.(d)

(c) Ezek. 18:30, 31; Ezek. 36:31; Isa. 30:22; Ps. 51:4; Jar. 31:18, 19; Joel 2:12, 13; Amos 5:15; Ps. 119:128; II Cor. 7:11.
(d) Ps. 119:6, 59, 106; Luke 1:6; II Kings 23:25.

III. Although repentance be not to be rested in, as any satisfaction for sin, or any cause of the pardon thereof,(e) which is the act of Gods free grace in Christ;(f) yet is it of such necessity to all sinners, that none may expect pardon without it.(g)

(e) Ezek. 36:31, 32; Ezek. 16:61, 62, 63.
(f) Hose 14:2, 4; Rome. 3:24; Eph. 1:7.
(g) Luke 13:3, 5; Acts 17:30, 31.

IV. As there is no sin so small, but it deserves damnation,(h) so there is no sin so great, that it can bring damnation upon those who truly repent.(i)

(h) Rome. 6:23; Rome. 5:12; Matt. 12:36.
(i) Isa. 55:7; Rome. 8:1; Isa. 1:16, 18.

V. Men ought not to content themselves with a general repentance, but it is every mans duty to endeavour to repent of his particular sins, particularly.(k)

(k) Ps. 19:13; Luke 19:8; I Tim. 1:13, 15.

VI. As every man is bound to make private confession of his sins to God, praying for the pardon thereof;(l) upon which, and the forsaking of them, he shall find mercy:(m) so, he that scandalizeth his brother, or the Church of Christ, ought to be willing, by a private or public confession, and sorrow for his sin, to declare his repentance to those that are offended,(n) who are thereupon to be reconciled to him, and in love to receive him.(o)

(l) Ps. 51:4, 5, 7, 9, 14; Ps. 32:5, 6.
(m) Prove. 28:13; I John 1:9.
(n) James 5:16; Luke 17:3, 4; Joshua 7:19; Ps. 51 throughout.
(o) II Cor. 2:8.

Chapter XVI.
Of Good Works.


I. Good works are only such as God hath commanded in His holy Word,(a) and not such as, without the warrant thereof, are devised by men, out of blind zeal, or upon any pretence of good intention.(b)

(a) Micah 6:8; Rome. 12:2; Hob. 13:21.
(b) Matt. 15:9; Isa. 29:13; I Pet. 1:18; Rome. 10:2; John 16:2; I Sam. 15:21, 22, 23.

II. These good works, done in obedience to Gods commandments, are the fruits and evidences of a true and lively faith:(c) and by them believers manifest their thankfulness,(d) strengthen their assurance,(e) edify their brethren,(f) adorn the profession of the Gospel,(g) stop the mouths of the adversaries,(h) and glorify God,(i) whose workmanship they are, created in Christ Jesus thereunto;(k) that, having their fruit unto holiness, they may have the end, eternal life.(l)

(c) James 2:18, 22.
(d) Ps. 116:12, 13; I Pet. 2:9.
(e) I John 2:3, 5; II Pet. 1:5, 6, 7, 8, 9, 10.
(f) II Cor. 9:2; Matt. 5:16.
(g) Tit. 2:5, 9, 10, 11, 12; I Tim. 6:1.
(h) I Pet. 2:15.
(i) I Pet. 2:12; Phil. 1:11; John 15:8.
(k) Eph. 2:10.
(l) Rome. 6:22.

III. Their ability to do good works is not at all of themselves, but wholly from the Spirit of Christ.(m) And that they may be enabled thereunto, besides the graces they have already received, there is required an actual influence of the same Holy Spirit, to work in them to will and to do of His good pleasure:(n) yet are they not hereupon to grow negligent, as if they were not bound to perform any duty, unless upon a special motion of the Spirit; but they ought to be diligent in stirring up the grace of God that is in them.(o)

(m) John 15:4, 5; Ezek. 36:26, 27.
(n) Phil. 2:13; Phil. 4:13; II Cor. 3:5.
(o) Phil. 2:12; Hob. 6:11, 12; II Pet. 1:3, 5, 10, 11; Isa. 64:7; II Tim. 1:6; Acts 26:6, 7; Jude ver. 20, 21.

IV. They, who in their obedience attain to the greatest height which is possible in this life, are so far from being able to supererogate, and to do more than God requires, as that they fall short of much which in duty they are bound to do.(p)

(p) Luke 17:10; Neh. 13:22; Job 9:2, 3; Gal. 5:17.

V. We cannot, by our best works, merit pardon of sin, or eternal life at the hand of God, by reason of the great disproportion that is between them and the glory to come; and the infinite distance that is between us and God, whom, by them, we can neither profit, nor satisfy for the debt of our former sins,(q) but when we have done all we can, we have done but our duty, and are unprofitable servants;(r) and because, as they are good, they proceed from His Spirit;(s) and as they are wrought by us, they are defiled, and mixed with so much weakness and imperfection, that they cannot endure the severity of Gods judgment.(t)

(q) Rome. 3:20; Rome. 4:2, 4, 6; Eph. 2:8, 9; Tit. 3:5, 6, 7; Rome. 8:18; Ps. 16:2; Job 22:2, 3; Job 35:7, 8.
(r) Luke 17:10.
(s) Gal. 5:22, 23.
(t) Isa. 64:6; Gal. 5:17; Rome. 7:15, 18; Ps. 143:2; Ps. 130:3.

VI. Yet notwithstanding, the persons of believers being accepted through Christ, their good works also are accepted in Him,(u) not as though they were in this life wholly unblameable and unreproveable in Gods sight;(w) but that He, looking upon them in His Son, is pleased to accept and reward that which is sincere, although accompanied with many weaknesses and imperfections.(x)

(u) Eph. 1:6; I Pet. 2:5; Exod. 28:38; Gen. 4:4 with Hob. 11:4.
(w) Job. 9:20; Ps. 143:2.
(x) Hob. 13:20, 21; II Cor. 8:12; Hob. 6:10; Matt. 25:21, 23.

VII. Works done by unregenerate men, although, for the matter of them, they may be things which God commands, and of good use both to themselves and others:(y) yet, because they proceed not from a heart purified by faith;(z) nor are done in a right manner according to the Word;(a) nor to a right end, the glory of God;(b) they are therefore sinful, and cannot please God, or make a man meet to receive grace from God.(c) And yet, their neglect of them is more sinful, and displeasing unto God.(d)

(y) II Kings 10:30, 31; I Kings 21:27, 29; Phil. 1:15, 16, 18.
(z) Gen. 4:5 with Hob. 11:4; Hob. 11:6.
(a) I Cor. 13:3; Isa. 1:12.
(b) Matt. 6:2, 5, 16.
(c) Hag. 2:14; Tit. 1:15; Amos 5:22, 23; Hose 1:4; Rome. 9:16; Titus 3:5.
(d) Ps. 14:4; Ps. 36:3; Job 21:14, 15; Matt. 25:41, 42, 43, 45; Matt. 23:23.

Chapter XVII.
Of the Perseverance of the Saints.


I. They, whom God hath accepted in His Beloved, effectually called, and sanctified by His Spirit, can neither totally, nor finally, fall away from the state of grace: but shall certainly persevere therein to the end, and be eternally saved.(a)

(a) Phil. 1:6; II Pet. 1:10; John 10:28, 29; I John 3:9; I Pet. 1:5, 9.

II. This perseverance of the saints depends not upon their own free will, but upon the immutability of the decree of election, flowing from the free and unchangeable love of God the Father;(b) upon the efficacy of the merit and intercession of Jesus Christ;(c) the abiding of the Spirit, and of the seed of God within them;(d) and the nature of the covenant of grace:(e) from all which arises also the certainty and infallibility thereof.(f)

(b) II Tim. 2:18, 19; Jar. 31:3.
(c) Hob. 10:10, 14; Hob. 13:20, 21; Hob. 9:12, 13, 14, 15; Rome. 8:33 to the end; John 17:11, 24; Luke 22:32; Hob. 7:25.
(d) John 14:16, 17; I John 2:27; I John 3:9.
(e) Jar. 32:40.
(f) John 10:28; II Thess. 3:3; I John 2:19.

III. Nevertheless, they may, through the temptations of Satan and of the world, the prevalence of corruption remaining in them, and the neglect of the means of their preservation, fall into grievous sins;(g) and, for a time, continue therein:(h) whereby they incur Gods displeasure,(i) and grieve His Holy Spirit,(k) come to be deprived of some measure of their graces and comforts,(l) have their hearts hardened,(m) and their consciences wounded,(n) hurt and scandalise others,(o) and bring temporal judgments upon themselves.(p)

(g) Matt. 26:70, 72, 74.
(h) Ps. 51 title and ver. 14.
(i) Isa. 64:5, 7, 9; II Sam. 11:27.
(k) Eph. 4:30.
(l) Ps. 51:8, 10, 12; Rev. 2:4; Cant. 5:2, 3, 4, 6.
(m) Isa. 63:17; Mark 6:52; Mark 16:14.
(n) Ps. 32:3, 4; Ps. 51:8.
(o) II Sam. 12:14.
(p) Ps. 89:31, 32; I Cor. 11:32.

Chapter XVIII.
Of the Assurance of Grace and Salvation.


I. Although hypocrites and other unregenerate men may vainly deceive themselves with false hopes, and carnal presumptions of being in the favour of God, and estate of salvation;(a) which hope of theirs shall perish:(b) yet such as truly believe in the Lord Jesus, and love Him in sincerity, endeavouring to walk in all good conscience before Him, may, in this life, be certainly assured that they are in the state of grace,(c) and may rejoice in the hope of the glory of God, which hope shall never make them ashamed.(d)

(a) Job 8:13, 14; Mic. 3:11; Deuteronomy. 29:19; John 8:41.
(b) Matt. 7:22, 23.
(c) I John 2:3; I John 3:14, 18, 19, 21, 24; I John 5:13.
(d) Rome. 5:2, 5.

II. This certainty is not a bare conjectural and probable persuasion, grounded upon a fallible hope;(e) but an infallible assurance of faith, founded upon the divine truth of the promises of salvation,(f) the inward evidence of those graces unto which these promises are made,(g) the testimony of the Spirit of adoption witnessing with our spirits that we are the children of God:(h) which Spirit is the earnest of our inheritance, whereby we are sealed to the day of redemption.(i)

(e) Hob. 6:11, 19.
(f) Hob. 6:17, 18.
(g) II Pet. 1:4, 5, 10, 11; I John 2:3; I John 3:14; II Cor. 1:12.
(h) Rome. 8:15, 16.
(i) Eph. 1:13, 14; Eph. 4:30; II Cor. 1:21, 22.

III. This infallible assurance doth not so belong to the essence of faith, but that a true believer may wait long, and conflict with many difficulties before he be partaker of it:(k) yet, being enabled by the Spirit to know the things which are freely given him of God, he may without extraordinary revelation, in the right use of ordinary means, attain thereunto.(l) And therefore it is the duty of everyone to give all diligence to make his calling and election sure;(m) that thereby his heart may be enlarged in peace and joy in the Holy Ghost, in love and thankfulness to God, and in strength and cheerfulness in the duties of obedience, the proper fruits of this assurance:(n) so far is it from inclining men to looseness.(o)

(k) I John 5:13; Isa. 50:10; Mark 9:24; Ps. 88 throughout; Ps. 77 to ver. 12.
(l) I Cor. 2:12; I John 4:13; Hob. 6:11, 12; Eph. 3:17, 18, 19.
(m) II Pet. 1:10.
(n) Rome. 5:1, 2, 5; Rome. 14:17; Rome. 15:13; Eph. 1:3, 4; Ps. 4:6, 7; Ps. 119:32.
(o) I John 2:1, 2; Rome. 6:1, 2; Tit. 2:11, 12, 14; II Cor. 7:1; Rome. 8:1, 12; I John 3:2, 3; Ps. 130:4; I John 1:6, 7.

IV. True believers may have the assurance of their salvation divers ways shaken, diminished, and intermitted; as, by negligence in preserving of it, by falling into some special sin, which wounds the conscience and grieves the Spirit; by some sudden or vehement temptation, by Gods withdrawing the light of His countenance, and suffering even such as fear Him to walk in darkness and to have no light:(p) yet are they never so utterly destitute of that seed of God, and life of faith, that love of Christ and the brethren, that sincerity of heart, and conscience of duty, out of which, by the operation of the Spirit, this assurance may, in due time, be revived;(q) and by the which, in the mean time, they are supported from utter despair.(r)

(p) Cant. 5:2, 3, 6; Ps. 51:8, 12, 14; Eph. 4:30, 31; Ps. 77:1 to 10; Matt. 26:69, 70, 71, 72; Ps. 31:22; Ps. 88 throughout; Isa. 50:10.
(q) I John 3:9; Luke 22:32; Job 13:15; Ps. 73:15; Ps. 51:8, 12; Isa. 50:10.
(r) Mic. 7:7, 8, 9; Jar. 32:40; Isa. 54:7, 8, 9, 10; Ps. 22:1; Ps. 88 throughout.

Chapter XIX.
Of the Law of God.


I. God gave to Adam a law, as a covenant of works, by which He bound him and all his posterity to personal, entire, exact, and perpetual obedience; promised life upon the fulfilling, and threatened death upon the breach of it: and endued him with power and ability to keep it.(a)

(a) Gen. 1:26, 27 with Gen. 2:17; Rome. 2:14, 15; Rome. 10:5; Rome. 5:12, 19; Gal. 3:10, 12; Eccles. 7:29; Job 28:28.

II. This law, after his fall, continued to be a perfect rule of righteousness, and, as such, was delivered by God upon Mount Sinai, in ten commandments, and written in two tables:(b) the four first commandments containing our duty towards God; and the other six our duty to man.(c)

(b) James 1:25; James 2:8, 10, 11, 12; Rome. 13:8, 9; Deuteronomy. 5:32; Deuteronomy. 10:4; Ex. 34:1.
(c) Matt. 22:37, 38, 39, 40.

III. Beside this law, commonly called moral, God was pleased to give to the people of Israel, as a church under age, ceremonial laws, containing several typical ordinances, partly of worship, prefiguring Christ, His graces, actions, sufferings, and benefits;(d) and partly holding forth divers instructions of moral duties.(e) All which ceremonial laws are now abrogated, under the new testament.(f)

(d) Hob. 9 chap.; Hob. 10:1; Gal. 4:1, 2, 3; Col. 2:17.
(e) I Cor. 5:7; II Cor. 6:17; Jude ver. 23.
(f) Col. 2:14, 16, 17; Dan. 9:27; Eph. 2:15, 16.

IV. To them also, as a body politic, He gave sundry judicial laws, which expired together with the State of that people; not obliging any other now, further than the general equity thereof may require.(g)

(g) Ex. 21 chap.; Ex. 22:1 to 29; Gen. 49:10 with I Pet. 2:13, 14; Matt. 5:17, with ver. 38, 39; I Cor. 9:8, 9, 10.

V. The moral law doth for ever bind all, as well justified persons as others, to the obedience thereof;(h) and that, not only in regard of the matter contained in it, but also in respect of the authority of God the Creator, who gave it:(i) neither doth Christ, in the Gospel, any way dissolve, but much strengthen this obligation.(k)

(h) Rome. 13:8, 9, 10; Eph. 6:2; I John 2:3, 4, 7, 8.
(i) James 2:10, 11.
(k) Matt. 5:17, 18, 19; James 2:8; Rome. 3:31.

VI. Although true believers be not under the law, as a covenant of works, to be thereby justified, or condemned;(l) yet is it of great use to them, as well as to others; in that, as a rule of life informing them of the will of God, and their duty, it directs, and binds them to walk accordingly;(m) discovering also the sinful pollutions of their nature, hearts, and lives;(n) so as, examining themselves thereby, they may come to further conviction of, humiliation for, and hatred against sin;(o) together with a clearer sight of the need they have of Christ, and the perfection of His obedience.(p) It is likewise of use to the regenerate, to restrain their corruptions, in that it forbids sin:(q) and the threatenings of it serve to show what even their sins deserve; and what afflictions, in this life, they may expect for them, although freed from the curse thereof threatened in the law.(r) The promises of it, in like manner, show them Gods approbation of obedience, and what blessings they may expect upon the performance thereof;(s) although not as due to them by the law, as a covenant of works.(t) So as, a mans doing good, and refraining from evil, because the law encourages to the one and deterred from the other, is no evidence of his being under the law; and not under grace.(u)

(l) Rome. 6:14; Gal. 2:16; Gal. 3:13; Gal. 4:4, 5; Acts 13:39; Rome. 8:1.
(m) Rome. 7:12, 22, 25; Ps. 119:4, 5, 6; I Cor. 7:19; Gal. 5:14, 16, 18, 19, 20, 21, 22, 23.
(n) Rome. 7:7; Rome. 3:20.
(o) James 1:23, 24, 25; Rome. 7:9, 14, 24.
(p) Gal. 3:24; Rome. 7:24, 25; Rome. 8:3, 4.
(q) Jam. 2:11; Ps. 119:101, 104, 128.
(r) Ezra 9:13, 14; Ps. 89:30, 31, 32, 33, 34.
(s) Lev. 26:1 to 14 with II Cor. 6:16; Eph. 6:2, 3; Ps. 37:11 with Matt. 5:5; Ps. 19:11.
(t) Gal. 2:16; Luke 17:10.
(u) Rome. 6:12, 14; I Pet. 3:8, 9, 10, 11, 12, with Ps. 34:12, 13, 14, 15, 16; Hob. 12:28, 29.

VII. Neither are the forementioned uses of the law contrary to the grace of the Gospel, but do sweetly comply with it;(w) the Spirit of Christ subduing and enabling the will of man to do that, freely and cheerfully, which the will of God, revealed in the law, requires to be done.(x)

(w) Gal. 3:21.
(x) Ezek. 36:27; Hob. 8:10 with Jar. 31:33.

Chapter XX.

Of Christian Liberty, and Liberty of Conscience.


I. The liberty which Christ hath purchased for believers under the Gospel consists in their freedom from the guilt of sin, and condemning wrath of God, the curse of the moral law;(a) and, in their being delivered from this present evil world, bondage to Satan, and dominion of sin;(b) from the evil of afflictions, the sting of death, the victory of the grace, and everlasting damnation;(c) as also, in their free access to God,(d) and their yielding obedience unto Him, not out of slavish fear, but a child-like love and willing mind.(e) All which were common also to believers under the law.(f) But, under the new testament, the liberty of Christians is further enlarged, in their freedom from the yoke of the ceremonial law, to which the Jewish Church was subjected;(g) and in greater boldness of access to the throne of grace,(h) and in fuller communications of the free Spirit of God, than believers under the law did ordinarily partake of.(i)

(a) Tit. 2:14; I Thess. 1:10; Gal. 3:13.
(b) Gal. 1:4; Col. 1:13; Acts 26:18; Rome. 6:14.
(c) Rome. 8:28; Ps. 119:71; I Cor. 15:54, 55, 56, 57; Rome. 8:1.
(d) Rome. 5:1, 2.
(e) Rome. 8:14, 15; I John 4:18.
(f) Gal. 3:9, 14.
(g) Gal. 4:1, 2, 3, 6, 7; Gal. 5:1; Acts 15:10, 11.
(h) Hob. 4:14, 16; Hob. 10:19, 20, 21, 22.
(i) John 7:38, 39; II Cor. 3:13, 17, 18.

II. God alone is Lord of the conscience,(k) and hath left it free from the doctrines and commandments of men, which are in any thing contrary to His Word; or beside it, if matters of faith or worship.(l) So that, to believe such doctrines, or to obey such commands, out of conscience,(m) is to betray true liberty of conscience: and the requiring of an implicit faith, and an absolute and blind obedience is to destroy liberty of conscience, and reason also.(n)

(k) Jam. 4:12; Rome. 14:4.
(l) Acts 4:19; Acts 5:29; I Cor. 7:23; Matt. 23:8, 9, 10; II Cor. 1:24; Matt. 15:9.
(m) Col. 2:20, 22, 23; Gal. 1:10; Gal. 2:4, 5; Gal. 5:1.
(n) Rome. 10:17; Rome. 14:23; Isa. 8:20; Acts 17:11; John 4:22; Hos. 5:11; Rev. 13:12, 16, 17; Jar. 8:9.

III. They who, upon pretence of Christian liberty, do practice any sin, or cherish any lust, do thereby destroy the end of Christian liberty, which is, that being delivered out of the hands of our enemies, we might serve the Lord, without fear, in holiness and righteousness before Him, all the days of our life.(o)

(o) Gal. 5:13; I Pet. 2:16; II Pet. 2:19; John 8:34; Luke 1:74, 75.

IV. And because the powers which God hath ordained, and the liberty which Christ hath purchased, are not intended by God to destroy, but mutually to uphold and preserve one another; they who, upon pretence of Christian liberty, shall oppose any lawful power, or the lawful exercise of it, whether it be civil or ecclesiastical, resist the ordinance of God.(p) And, for their publishing of such opinions, or maintaining of such practices, as are contrary to the light of nature, or to the known principles of Christianity, whether concerning faith, worship, or conversation; or, to the power of godliness; or, such erroneous opinions or practices, as either in their own nature, or in the manner of publishing or maintaining them, are destructive to the external peace and order which Christ hath established in the Church, they may lawfully be called to account, and proceeded against by the censures of the Church,(q) and by the power of the civil magistrate.(r)

(p) Matt. 12:25; I Pet. 2:13, 14, 16; Rome. 13:1 to 8; Hob. 13:17.
(q) Rome. 1:32 with I Cor. 5:1, 5, 11, 13; II John ver. 10, 11, and II Thess. 3:14, and I Tim. 6:3, 4, 5, and Tit. 1:10, 11, 13, and Tit. 3:10 with Matt. 18:15, 16, 17; I Tim. 1:19, 20; Rev. 2:2, 14, 15, 20; Rev. 3:9.
(r) Deuteronomy. 13:6 to 12; Rome. 13:3, 4 with II John ver. 10, 11; Ezra 7:23, 25, 26, 27, 28; Rev. 17:12, 16, 17; Neh. 13:15, 17, 21, 22, 25, 30; II Kings 23:5, 6, 9, 20, 21; II Chron. 34:33; II Chron. 15:12, 13, 16; Dan. 3:29; I Tim. 2:2; Isa. 49:23; Such. 13:2, 3.

Chapter XXI.
Of Religious Worship and the Sabbath-day.


I. The light of nature shows that there is a God, who hath lordship and sovereignty over all, is good, and doth good unto all, and is therefore to be feared, loved, praised, called upon, trusted in, and served, with all the heart, and with all the soul, and with all the might.(a) But the acceptable way of worshipping the true God is instituted by Himself, and so limited by His own revealed will, that He may not be worshipped according to the imaginations and devices of men, or the suggestions of Satan, under any visible representation, or any other way not prescribed in the holy Scripture.(b)

(a) Rome. 1:20; Acts 17:24; Ps. 119:68; Jar. 10:7; Ps. 31:23; Ps. 18:3; Rome. 10:12; Ps. 62:8; Josh. 24:14; Mark 12:33.
(b) Deuteronomy. 12:32; Matt. 15:9; Acts 17:25; Matt. 4:9, 10; Deuteronomy. 4:15 to 20; Exod. 20:4, 5, 6; Col. 2:23.

II. Religious worship is to be given to God, the Father, Son, and Holy Ghost; and to Him alone;(c) not to angels, saints, or any other creature:(d) and since the fall, not without a Mediator; nor in the mediation of any other but of Christ alone.(e)

(c) Matt. 4:10 with John 5:23 and II Cor. 13:14.
(d) Col. 2:18, Rev. 19:10; Rome. 1:25.
(e) John 14:6; I Tim. 2:5; Eph. 2:18; Col. 3:17.

III. Prayer, with thanksgiving, being one special part of religious worship,(f) is by God required of all men:(g) and that it may be accepted, it is to be made in the name of the Son,(h) by the help of His Spirit,(i) according to His will,(k) with understanding, reverence, humility, fervency, faith, love, and perseverance;(l) and, if vocal, in a known tongue.(m)

(f) Phil. 4:6.
(g) Ps. 65:2.
(h) John 14:13, 14; I Pet. 2:5.
(i) Rome. 8:26.
(k) I John 5:14.
(l) Ps. 47:7; Eccles. 5:1, 2; Hob. 12:28; Gen. 18:27; James 5:16; James 1:6, 7; Mark 11:24; Matt. 6:12, 14, 15; Col. 4:2; Eph. 6:18.
(m) I Cor. 14:14.

IV. Prayer is to be made for things lawful;(n) and for all sorts of men living, or that shall live hereafter:(o) but not for the dead,(p) nor for those of whom it may be known that they have sinned the sin unto death.(q)

(n) I John 5:14.
(o) I Tim. 2:1, 2; John 17:20; II Sam. 7:29; Ruth 4:12.
(p) II Sam. 12:21, 22, 23 with Luke 16:25, 26; Rev. 14:13.
(q) I John 5:16.

V. The reading of the Scriptures with godly fear,(r) the sound preaching(s) and conscionable hearing of the Word, in obedience unto God, with understanding, faith and reverence;(t) singing of psalms with grace in the heart;(u) as also, the due administration and worthy receiving of the sacraments instituted by Christ; are all parts of the ordinary religious worship of God:(w) beside religious oaths,(x) vows,(y) solemn fastings,(z) and thanksgivings, upon special occasions,(a) which are, in their several times and seasons, to be used in a holy and religious manner.(b)

(r) Acts 15:21; Rev. 1:3.
(s) II Tim. 4:2.
(t) James 1:22; Acts 10:33; Matt. 13:19; Hob. 4:2; Isa. 66:2.
(u) Col. 3:16; Eph. 5:19; James 5:13.
(w) Matt. 28:19; I Cor. 11:23 to 29; Acts 2:42.
(x) Deuteronomy. 6:13 with Neh. 10:29.
(y) Isa. 19:21 with Eccles. 5:4, 5.
(z) Joel 2:12; Esther 4:16; Matt. 9:15; I Cor. 7:5.
(a) Ps. 107 throughout; Esther 9:22.
(b) Hob. 12:28.

VI. Neither prayer, nor any other part of religious worship, is now under the Gospel either tied unto, or made more acceptable by any place in which it is performed, or towards which it is directed:(c) but God is to be worshipped everywhere,(d) in spirit and truth;(e) as in private families(f) daily,(g) and in secret each one by himself;(h) so, more solemnly, in the public assemblies, which are not carelessly or wilfully to be neglected, or forsaken, when God, by His Word or providence, calls thereunto.(i)

(c) John 4:21.
(d) Mal. 1:11; I Tim. 2:8.
(e) John 4:23, 24.
(f) Jar. 10:25; Deuteronomy. 6:6, 7; Job 1:5; II Sam. 6:18, 20; I Pet. 3:7; Acts 10:2.
(g) Matt. 6:11.
(h) Matt. 6:6; Eph. 6:18.
(i) Isa. 56:6, 7; Hob. 10:25; Prove. 1:20, 21, 24; Prove. 8:34; Acts 13:42; Luke 4:16; Acts 2:42.

VII. As it is the law of nature, that, in general, a due proportion of time be set apart for the worship of God; so, in His Word, by a positive, moral, and perpetual commandment, binding all men, in all ages, He hath particularly appointed one day in seven, for a Sabbath, to be kept holy unto Him:(k) which, from the beginning of the world to the resurrection of Christ, was the last day of the week; and, from the resurrection of Christ, was changed into the first day of the week,(l) which, in Scripture, is called the Lords Day,(m) and is to be continued to the end of the world, as the Christian Sabbath.(n)

(k) Exod. 20:8, 10, 11; Isa. 56:2, 4, 6, 7.
(l) Gen. 2:2, 3; I Cor. 16:1, 2; Acts 20:7.
(m) Rev. 1:10.
(n) Exod. 20:8, 10, with Matt. 5:17, 18.

VIII. This Sabbath is then kept holy unto the Lord, when men, after a due preparing of their hearts, and ordering of their common affairs beforehand, do not only observe an holy rest, all the day, from their own works, words, and thoughts about their worldly employments and recreations,(o) but also are taken up the whole time in the public and private exercises of His worship, and in the duties of necessity and mercy.(p)

(o) Exod. 20:8; Exod. 16:23, 25, 26, 29, 30; Exod. 31:15, 16, 17; Isa. 58:13; Neh. 13:15, 16, 17, 18, 19, 21, 22.
(p) Isa. 58:13; Matt. 12:1 to 13.

Chapter XXII.
Of Lawful Oaths and Vows.

I. A lawful oath is a part of religious worship,(a) wherein, upon just occasion, the person swearing solemnly calls God to witness what he asserteth, or promises, and to judge him according to the truth or falsehood of what he swears.(b)

(a) Deuteronomy. 10:20.
(b) Exod. 20:7; Lev. 19:12; II Cor. 1:23, II Chron. 6:22, 23.

II. The name of God only is that by which men ought to swear; and therein it is to be used with all holy fear and reverence.(c) Therefore, to swear vainly or rashly, by that glorious and dreadful Name; or, to swear at all by any other thing, is sinful, and to be abhorred.(d) Yet, as in matters of weight and moment, an oath is warranted by the Word of God, under the New Testament, as well as under the Old;(e) so a lawful oath, being imposed by lawful authority, in such matters ought to be taken.(f)

(c) Deuteronomy. 6:13.
(d) Exod. 20:7; Jar. 5:7; Matt. 5:34, 37; James 5:12.
(e) Hob. 6:16; II Cor. 1:23; Isa. 65:16.
(f) I Kings 8:31; Neh. 13:25; Ezra 10:5.

III. Whosoever takes an oath ought duly to consider the weightiness of so solemn an act; and therein to avouch nothing, but what he is fully persuaded is the truth.(g) Neither may any man bind himself by oath to anything but what is good and just, and what he believes so to be, and what he is able and resolved to perform.(h) Yet is it a sin to refuse an oath touching anything that is good and just, being imposed by lawful authority.(i)

(g) Exod. 20:7; Jar. 4:2.
(h) Gen. 24:2, 3, 5, 6, 8, 9.
(i) Number. 5:19, 21; Neh. 5:12; Exod. 22:7, 8, 9, 10, 11.

IV. An oath is to be taken in the plain and common sense of the words, without equivocation, or mental reservation.(k) It cannot oblige to sin: but in anything not sinful, being taken, it binds to performance, although to a mans own hurt.(l) Not is it to be violated, although made to heretics, or infidels.(m)

(k) Jar. 4:2; Ps. 24:4.
(l) I Sam. 25:22, 32, 33, 34; Ps. 15:4.
(m) Ezek. 17:16, 18, 19; Josh. 9:18, 19 with II Sam. 21:1.

V. A vow is of the like nature with a promissory oath, and ought to be made with the like religious care, and to be performed with the like faithfulness.(n)

(n) Isa. 19:21; Eccles. 5:4, 5, 6; Ps. 61:8; Ps. 66:13, 14.

VI. It is not to be made to any creature, but to God alone:(o) and that it may be accepted, it is to be made voluntarily, out of faith, and conscience of duty, in way of thankfulness for mercy received, or for the obtaining of what we want; whereby we more strictly bind ourselves to necessary duties; or to other things, so far and so long as they may fitly conduce thereunto.(p)

(o) Ps. 76:11; Jar. 44:25, 26.
(p) Deuteronomy. 23:21, 22, 23; Ps. 50:14; Gen. 28:20, 21, 22; I Sam. 1:11; Ps. 66:13, 14; Ps. 132:2, 3, 4, 5.

VII. No man may vow to do anything forbidden in the Word of God, or what would hinder any duty therein commanded, or which is not in his own power, and for the performance whereof he hath no promise of ability from God.(q) In which respects, Popish monastical vows of perpetual single life, professed poverty, and regular obedience, are so far from being degrees of higher perfection, that they are superstitious and sinful snares, in which no Christian may entangle himself.(r)

(q) Acts 23:12, 14; Mark 6:26; Numb. 30:5, 8, 12, 13.
(r) Matt. 19:11, 12; I Cor. 7:2, 9; Eph. 4:28; I Peter 4:2; I Cor. 7:23.

Chapter XXIII.
Of the Civil Magistrate.


I. God, the supreme Lord and King of all the world, hath ordained civil magistrates, to be, under Him, over the people, for His own glory, and the public good: and, to this end, hath armed them with the power of the sword, for the defence and encouragement of them that are good, and for the punishment of evil doers.(a)

(a) Rome. 13:1, 2, 3, 4; I Pet. 2:13, 14.

II. It is lawful for Christians to accept and execute the office of a magistrate, when called thereunto;(b) in the managing whereof, as they ought especially to maintain piety, justice, and peace, according to the wholesome laws of each commonwealth;(c) so for that end, they may lawfully now, under the New Testament, wage war, upon just and necessary occasion.(d)

(b) Prove. 8:15, 16; Rome. 13:1, 2, 4.
(c) Ps. 2:10, 11, 12; I Tim. 2:2; Ps. 82:3, 4; II Sam. 23:3; I Pet. 2:13.
(d) Luke 3:14; Rome. 13:4; Matt. 8:9, 10; Acts 10:1, 2; Rev. 17:14, 16.

III. The civil magistrate may not assume to himself the administration of the Word and sacraments, or the power of the keys of the kingdom of heaven:(e) yet he hath authority, and it is his duty, to take order, that unity and peace be. preserved in the Church, that the truth of God be kept pure and entire; that all blasphemies and heresies be suppressed; all corruptions and abuses in worship and discipline prevented or reformed; and all the ordinances of God duly settled, administrated, and observed.(f) For the better effecting whereof, he hath power to call synods, to be present at them, and to provide that whatsoever is transacted in them be according to the mind of God.(g)

(e) II Chron. 26:18 with Matt. 18:17 and Matt. 16:19; I Cor. 12:28, 29; Eph. 4:11, 12; I Cor. 4:1, 2; Rome. 10:15; Hob. 5:4.
(f) Isa. 49:23; Ps. 122:9; Ezra 7:23, 25, 26, 27, 28; Lev. 24:16; Deuteronomy. 13:5, 6, 12; I Kings 18:4; I Chron. 13:1 to 9; II Kings 23:1 to 26; II Chron. 34:33; II Chron. 15:12, 13.
(g) II Chron. 19:8, 9, 10, 11; II Chron. 29 and 30; Matt. 2:4, 5.

IV. It is the duty of people to pray for magistrates,(h) to honour their persons,(i) to pay them tribute or other dues,(k) to obey their lawful commands, and to be subject to their authority, for conscience sake.(l) Infidelity, or difference in religion, doth not make void the magistrates just and legal authority, nor free the people from their due obedience to them:(m) from which ecclesiastical persons are not exempted,(n) much less hath the Pope any power and jurisdiction over them in their dominions, or over any of their people; and, least of all, to deprive them of their dominions, or lives, if he shall judge them to be heretics, or upon any other pretence whatsoever.(o)

(h) I Tim. 2:1, 2.
(i) I Pet. 2:17.
(k) Rome. 13:6, 7.
(l) Rome. 13:5; Tit. 3:1.
(m) I Pet. 2:13, 14, 16.
(n) Rome. 13:1; I Kings 2:35; Acts 25:9, 10, 11; II Pet. 2:1, 10, 11; Jude ver. 8, 9, 10, 11.
(o) II Thess. 2:4; Rev. 13:15, 16, 17.

Chapter XXIV.
Of Marriage and Divorce.


I. Marriage is to be between one man and one woman: neither is it lawful for any man to have more than one wife, nor for any woman to have more than one husband; at the same time.(a)

(a) Gen. 2:24; Matt. 19:5, 6; Prove. 2:17.

II. Marriage was ordained for the mutual help of husband and wife,(b) for the increase of mankind with a legitimate issue, and of the Church with an holy seed;(c) and for preventing of uncleanness.(d)

(b) Gen. 2:18.
(c) Mal. 2:15.
(d) I Cor. 7:2, 9.

III. It is lawful for all sorts of people to marry, who are able with judgment to give their consent.(e) Yet is it the duty of Christians to marry only in the Lord:(f) and therefore such as profess the true reformed religion should not marry with infidels, papists, or other idolaters: neither should such as are godly be unequally yoked, by marrying with such as are notoriously wicked in their life, or maintain damnable heresies.(g)

(e) Hob. 13:4; I Tim. 4:3; I Cor. 7:36, 37, 38; Gen. 24:57, 58.
(f) I Cor. 7:39.
(g) Gen. 34:14; Exod. 34:16; Deuteronomy. 7:3, 4; I Kings 11:4; Neh. 13:25, 26, 27; Mal. 2:11, 12; II Cor. 6:14.

IV. Marriage ought not to be within the degrees of consanguinity or affinity forbidden by the Word;(h) nor can such incestuous marriages ever be made lawful by any law of man or consent of parties, so as those persons may live together as man and wife.(i) The man may not marry any of his wifes kindred nearer in blood than he may of his own; nor the woman of her husbands kindred nearer in blood than of her own.(k)

(h) Lev. 18 ch.; I Cor. 5:1; Amos 2:7.
(i) Mark 6:18; Lev. 18:24, 25, 26, 27, 28.
(k) Lev. 20:19, 20, 21.

V. Adultery or fornication committed after a contract, being detected before marriage, gives just occasion to the innocent party to dissolve that contract.(l) In the case of adultery after marriage, it is lawful for the innocent party to sue out a divorce:(m) and, after the divorce, to marry another, as if the offending party were dead.(n)

(l) Matt. 1:18, 19, 20.
(m) Matt. 5:31, 32.
(n) Matt. 19:9; Rome. 7:2, 3.

VI. Although the corruption of man be such as is apt to study arguments unduly to put asunder those whom God hath joined together in marriage: yet nothing but adultery, or such wilful desertion as can no way be remedied by the Church or civil magistrate, is cause sufficient of dissolving the bond of marriage:(o) wherein, a public and orderly course of proceeding is to be observed; and the persons concerned in it not left to their own wills and discretion, in their own case.(p)

(o) Matt. 19:8, 9; I Cor. 7:15; Matt. 19:6.
(p) Deuteronomy. 24:1, 2, 3, 4.

Chapter XXV.
Of the Church.


I. The catholic or universal Church which is invisible, consists of the whole number of the elect, that have been, are, or shall be gathered into one, under Christ the Head thereof; and is the spouse, the body, the fullness of Him that fills all in all.(a)

(a) Eph. 1:10, 22, 23; Eph. 5:23, 27, 32; Col. 1:18.

II. The visible Church, which is also catholic or universal under the Gospel (not confined to one nation as before under the law), consists of all those throughout the world that profess the true religion;(b) and of their children:(c) and is the kingdom of the Lord Jesus Christ,(d) the house and family of God,(e) out of which there is no ordinary possibility of salvation.(f)

(b) I Cor. 1:2; I Cor. 12:12, 13; Ps. 2:8; Rev. 7:9; Rome. 15:9, 10, 11, 12.
(c) I Cor. 7:14; Acts 2:39; Ezek. 16:20, 21; Rome. 11:16; Gen. 3:15; Gen. 17:7.
(d) Matt. 13:47; Isa. 9:7.
(e) Eph. 2:19; Eph. 3:15.
(f) Acts 2:47.

III. Unto this catholic visible Church Christ hath given the ministry, oracles, and ordinances of God, for the gathering and perfecting of the saints, in this life, to the end of the world: and doth by His own presence and Spirit, according to His promise, make them effectual thereunto.(g)

(g) I Cor. 12:28; Eph. 4:11, 12, 13; Matt. 28:19, 20; Isa. 59:21.

IV. This catholic Church hath been sometimes more, sometimes less visible.(h) And particular Churches, which are members thereof, are more or less pure, according as the doctrine of the Gospel is taught and embraced, ordinances administered, and public worship performed more or less purely in them.(i)

(h) Rome. 11:3, 4; Rev. 12:6, 14.
(i) Rev. 2 and 3; I Cor. 5:6, 7.

V. The purest Churches under heaven are subject both to mixture and error:(k) and some have so degenerated, as to become no Churches of Christ, but synagogues of Satan.(l) Nevertheless, there shall be always a Church on earth, to worship God according to His will.(m)

(k) I Cor. 13:12; Rev. 2 and 3; Matt. 13:24, 25, 26, 27, 28, 29, 30, 47.
(l) Rev. 18:2; Rome. 11:18, 19, 20, 21, 22.
(m) Matt. 16:18; Ps. 72:17; Ps. 102:28; Matt. 28:19, 20.

VI. There is no other head of the Church, but the Lord Jesus Christ;(n) nor can the Pope of Rome, in any sense, be head thereof; but is that Antichrist, that man of sin, and son of perdition, that exalts himself, in the Church, against Christ and all that is called God.(o)

(n) Col. 1:18; Eph. 1:22.
(o) Matt. 23:8, 9, 10; II Thess. 2:3, 4, 8, 9; Rev. 13:6.

Chapter XXVI.
Of the Communion of the Saints.


I. All saints, that are united to Jesus Christ their Head by His Spirit and by faith, have fellowship with Him in His grace, sufferings, death, resurrection, and glory:(a) and, being united to one another in love, they have communion in each others gifts and graces,(b) and are obliged to the performance of such duties, public and private, as do conduce to their mutual good, both in the inward and outward man.(c)

(a) John 1:3; Eph. 3:16, 17, 18, 19; John 1:16; Eph. 2:5, 6; Phil. 3:10; Rome. 6:5, 6; II Tim. 2:12.
(b) Eph. 4:15, 16; I Cor. 12:7; I Cor. 3:21, 22, 23; Col. 2:19.
(c) I Thess. 5:11, 14; Rome. 1:11, 12, 14; I John 3:16, 17, 18; Gal. 6:10.

II. Saints by profession are bound to maintain a holy fellowship and communion in the worship of God; and in performing such other spiritual services as tend to their mutual edification;(d) as also in relieving each other in outward things, according to their several abilities, and necessities. Which communion, as God offers opportunity, is to be extended unto all those who, in every place, call upon the name of the Lord Jesus.(e)

(d) Hob. 10:24, 25; Acts 2:42, 46; Isa. 2:3; I Cor. 11:20.
(e) Acts 2:44, 45; I John 3:17; II Cor. 8 and 9 chapters; Acts 11:29, 30.

III. This communion which the saints have with Christ, doth not make them, in any wise, partakers of the substance of His Godhood; or to be equal with Christ, in any respect: either of which to affirm is impious and blasphemous.(f) Nor doth their communion one with another, as saints, take away, or infringe the title or propriety which each man hath in his goods and possessions.(g)

(f) Col. 1:18, 19; I Cor. 8:6; Isa. 42:8; I Tim. 6:15, 16; Ps. 45:7, with Hob. 1:8, 9.
(g) Exod. 20:15; Eph. 4:28; Acts 5:4.

Chapter XXVII.
Of the Sacraments.


I. Sacraments are holy signs and seals of the covenant of grace,(a) immediately instituted by God,(b) to represent Christ and His benefits; and to confirm our interest in Him;(c) as also, to put a visible difference between those that belong unto the Church, and the rest of the world;(d) and solemnly to engage them to the service of God in Christ, according to His Word.(e)

(a) Rome. 4:11; Gen. 17:7, 10.
(b) Matt. 28:19; I Cor. 11:23.
(c) I Cor. 10:16; I Cor. 11:25, 26; Gal. 3:17.
(d) Rome. 15:8; Exod. 12:48; Gen. 34:14.
(e) Rome. 6:3, 4; I Cor. 10:16, 21.

II. There is in every sacrament a spiritual relation, or sacramental union, between the sign and the thing signified: whence it comes to pass, that the names and effects of the one are attributed to the other.(f)

(f) Gen. 17:10; Matt. 26:27, 28; Tit. 3:5.

III. The grace which is exhibited in or by the sacraments rightly used, is not conferred by any power in them; neither doth the efficacy of a sacrament depend upon the piety or intention of him that doth administer it:(g) but upon the work of the Spirit,(h) and the word of institution, which contains, together with a precept authorizing the use thereof, a promise of benefit to worthy receivers.(i)

(g) Rome. 2:28, 29; I Pet. 3:21.
(h) Matt. 3:11; I Cor. 12:13.
(i) Matt. 26:27, 28; Matt. 28:19, 20.

IV. There are only two sacraments ordained by Christ our Lord in the Gospel; that is to say, Baptism and the Supper of the Lord: neither of which may be dispensed by any but by a minister of the Word lawfully ordained.(k)

(k) Matt. 28:19; I Cor. 11:20, 23, I Cor. 4:1; Hob. 5:4.

V. The sacraments of the Old Testament, in regard to the spiritual things thereby signified and exhibited, were, for substance, the same with those of the New.(l)

(l) I Cor. 10:1, 2, 3, 4.

Chapter XXVIII.
Of Baptism.


I. Baptism is a sacrament of the New Testament, ordained by Jesus Christ,(a) not only for the solemn admission of the party baptised into the visible Church;(b) but also, to be unto him a sign and seal of the covenant of grace,(c) of his ingrafting into Christ,(d) of regeneration,(e) of remission of sins,(f) and of his giving up unto God through Jesus Christ, to walk in the newness of life.(g) Which sacrament is, by Christs own appointment, to be continued in His Church until the end of the world.(h)

(a) Matt. 28:19.
(b) I Cor. 12:13.
(c) Rome. 4:11 with Col. 2:11, 12.
(d) Gal. 3:27; Rome. 6:5.
(e) Tit. 3:5.
(f) Mark 1:4.
(g) Rome. 6:3, 4.
(h) Matt. 28:19, 20.

II. The outward element to be used in this sacrament is water, wherewith the party is to be baptised, in the name of the Father, and of the Son, and of the Holy Ghost, by a minister of the Gospel, lawfully called thereunto.(i)

(i) Matt. 3:11; John 1:33; Matt. 28:19, 20.

III. Dipping of the person into the water is not necessary; but Baptism is rightly administered by pouring or sprinkling water upon the person.(k)

(k) Hob. 9:10, 19, 20, 21, 22; Acts 2:41; Acts 16:33; Mark 7:4.

IV. Not only those that do actually profess faith in and obedience unto Christ,(l) but also the infants of one or both believing parents, are to be baptised.(m)

(l) Mark 16:15, 16; Acts 8:37, 38.
(m) Gen. 17:7, 9, 10 with Gal. 3:9, 14 and Col. 2:11, 12 & Acts 2:38, 39 & Rome. 4:11, 12; I Cor. 7:14; Matt. 28:19; Mark 10:13, 14, 15, 16; Luke 18:15.

V. Although it be a great sin to contemn or neglect this ordinance,(n) yet grace and salvation are not so inseparably annexed unto it, as that no person can be regenerated or saved without it;(o) or, that all that are baptised are undoubtedly regenerated.(p)

(n) Luke 7:30 with Exod. 4:24, 25, 26.
(o) Rome. 4:11; Acts 10:2, 4, 22, 31, 45, 47.
(p) Acts 8:13, 23.

VI. The efficacy of Baptism is not tied to that moment of time wherein it is administered;(q) yet notwithstanding, by the right use of this ordinance, the grace promised is not only offered, but really exhibited and conferred, by the Holy Ghost, to such (whether of age or infants) as that grace belongs unto, according to the counsel of Gods own will, in His appointed time.(r)

(q) John 3:5, 8.
(r) Gal. 3:27; Titus 3:5; Eph. 5:25, 26; Acts 2:38, 41.

VII. The sacrament of Baptism is but once to be administered unto any person.(s)

(s) Titus 3:5.

Chapter XXIX.
Of the Lords Supper.


I. Our Lord Jesus, in the night wherein He was betrayed, instituted the sacrament of His body and blood, called the Lords Supper, to be observed in His Church, unto the end of the world, for the perpetual remembrance of the sacrifice of Himself in His death; the sealing all benefits thereof unto true believers, their spiritual nourishment and growth in Him, their further engagement in and to all duties which they owe unto Him; and to be a bond and pledge of their communion with Him, and with each other, as members of His mystical body.(a)

(a) I Cor. 11:23, 24, 25, 26; I Cor. 10:16, 17, 21; I Cor. 12:13.

II. In this sacrament, Christ is not offered up to His Father; nor any real sacrifice made at all for remission of sins of the quick or dead;(b) but only a commemoration of that one offering up of Himself, by Himself, upon the cross, once for all: and a spiritual oblation of all possible praise unto God for the same:(c) so that the Popish sacrifice of the mass (as they call it) is most abominably injurious to Christs one, only sacrifice, the alone propitiation for all the sins of His elect.(d)

(b) Hob. 9:22, 25, 26, 28.
(c) I Cor. 11:24, 25, 26; Matt. 26:26, 27.
(d) Hob. 7:23, 24, 27; Hob. 10:11, 12, 14, 18.

III. The Lord Jesus hath, in this ordinance, appointed His ministers to declare His word of institution to the people; to pray, and bless the elements of bread and wine, and thereby to set them apart from a common to a holy use; and to take and break the bread, to take the cup, and (they communicating also themselves) to give both to the communicants;(e) but to none who are not then present in the congregation.(f)

(e) Matt. 26:26, 27, 28 & Mark 14:22, 23, 24 and Luke 22:19, 20 with I Cor. 11:23, 24, 25, 26.
(f) Acts. 20:7; I Cor. 11:20.

IV. Private masses, or receiving this sacrament by a priest or any other alone;(g) as likewise, the denial of the cup to the people,(h) worshipping the elements, the lifting them up or carrying them about for adoration, and the reserving them for any pretended religious use; are all contrary to the nature of this sacrament, and to the institution of Christ.(i)

(g) I Cor. 10:16.
(h) Mark 14:23; I Cor. 11:25, 26, 27, 28, 29.
(i) Matt. 15:9.

V. The outward elements in this sacrament, duly set apart to the uses ordained by Christ, have such relation to Him crucified, as that, truly, yet sacramentally only, they are sometimes called by the name of the things they represent, to wit, the body and blood of Christ;(k) albeit in substance and nature they still remain truly and only bread and wine, as they were before.(l)

(k) Matt. 26:26, 27, 28.
(l) I Cor. 11:26, 27, 28; Matt. 26:29.

VI. That doctrine which maintains a change of the substance of bread and wine into the substance of Christs body and blood (commonly called transubstantiation) by consecration of a priest, or by any other way, is repugnant, not to Scripture alone, but even to common sense and reason; overthrows the nature of the sacrament, and hath been, and is the cause of manifold superstitions; yea, of gross idolatries.(m)

(m) Acts 3:21 with I Cor. 11:24, 25, 26; Luke 24:6, 39.

VII. Worthy receivers outwardly partaking of the visible elements in this sacrament,(n) do then also, inwardly by faith, really and indeed, yet not carnally and corporally, but spiritually, receive and feed upon Christ crucified, and all benefits of His death: the body and blood of Christ being then, not corporally or carnally, in, with, or under the bread and wine; yet, as really, but spiritually, present to the faith of believers in that ordinance, as the elements themselves are to their outward senses.(o)

(n) I Cor. 11:28.
(o) I Cor. 10:16.

VIII. Although ignorant and wicked men receive the outward elements in this sacrament: yet they receive not the thing signified thereby, but by their unworthy coming thereunto are guilty of the body and blood of the Lord to their own damnation. Wherefore, all ignorant and ungodly persons, as they are unfit to enjoy communion with Him, so are they unworthy of the Lords table; and cannot, without great sin against Christ while they remain such, partake of these holy mysteries,(p) or be admitted thereunto.(q)

(p) I Cor. 11:27, 28, 29; II Cor. 6:14, 15, 16.
(q) I Cor. 5:6, 7, 13; II Thess. 3:6, 14, 15; Matt. 7:6.

Chapter XXX.
Of Church Censures.


I. The Lord Jesus, as King and Head of His Church, hath therein appointed a government, in the hand of Church officers, distinct from the civil magistrate.(a)

(a) Isa. 9:6, 7; I Tim. 5:17; I Thess. 5:12; Acts 20:17, 28; Hob. 13:7, 17, 24; I Cor. 12:28; Matt. 28:18, 19, 20.

II. To these officers the keys of the kingdom of heaven are committed: by virtue whereof, they have power respectively to retain, and remit sins; to shut that kingdom against the impenitent, both by the Word and censures; and to open it unto penitent sinners, by the ministry of the Gospel, and by absolution from censures, as occasion shall require.(b)

(b) Matt. 16:19; Matt. 18:17, 18; John 20:21, 22, 23; II Cor. 2:6, 7, 8.

III. Church censures are necessary, for the reclaiming and gaining of offending brethren, for deterring of others from the like offences, for purging out of that leaven which might infect the whole lump, for vindicating the honour of Christ, and the holy profession of the Gospel, and for preventing the wrath of God, which might justly fall upon the Church, if they should suffer His covenant and the seals thereof to be profaned by notorious and obstinate offenders.(c)

(c) I Cor. 5 chap.; I Tim. 5:20; Matt. 7:6; I Tim. 1:20; I Cor. 11:27 to the end, with Jude ver. 23.

IV. For the better attaining of these ends, the officers of the Church are to proceed by admonition; suspension from the sacrament of the Lords Supper for a season; and by excommunication from the Church; according to the nature of the crime, and demerit of the person.(d)

(d) I Thess. 5:12; II Thess. 3:6, 14, 15; I Cor. 5:4, 5, 13; Matt. 18:17; Tit. 3:10.

Chapter XXXI.
Of Synods and Councils.


I. For the better government, and further edification of the Church, there ought to be such assemblies as are commonly called synods or councils.(a)

(a) Acts 15:2, 4, 6.

II. As magistrates may lawfully call a synod of ministers, and other fit persons, to consult and advise with, about matters of religion;(b) so, if magistrates be open enemies to the Church, the ministers of Christ of themselves, by virtue of their office, or they, with other fit persons upon delegation from their Churches, may meet together in such assemblies.(c)

(b) Isa. 49:23; I Tim. 2:1, 2; II Chron. 19:8, 9, 10, 11; II Chron. 29, 30 chaps.; Matt. 2:4, 5; Prove. 11:14.
(c) Acts 15:2, 4, 22, 23, 25.

III. It belongs to synods and councils, ministerially to determine controversies of faith and cases of conscience; to set down rules and directions for the better ordering of the public worship of God, and government of his Church; to receive complaints in cases of maladministration, and authoritatively to determine the same: which decrees and determinations, if consonant to the Word of God, are to be received with reverence and submission; not only for their agreement with the Word, but also for the power whereby they are made, as being an ordinance of God appointed thereunto in His Word.(d)

(d) Acts 15:15, 19, 24, 27, 28, 29, 30, 31; Acts 16:4; Matt. 18:17, 18, 19, 20.

III. All synods or councils, since the Apostles times, whether general or particular, may err; and many have erred. Therefore they are not to be made the rule of faith, or practice; but to be used as a help in both.(e)

(e) Eph. 2:20; Acts 17:11; I Cor. 2:5; II Cor. 1:24.

IV. Synods and councils are to handle, or conclude, nothing, but that which is ecclesiastical: and are not to intermeddle with civil affairs which concern the commonwealth; unless by way of humble petition, in cases extraordinary; or by way of advice, for satisfaction of conscience, if they be thereunto required by the civil magistrate.(f)

(f) Luke 12:13, 14; John 18:36.

Chapter XXXII.
Of the State of Man After Death, and of the Resurrection of the Dead.


I. The bodies of men, after death, return to dust and see corruption:(a) but their souls (which neither die nor sleep) having an immortal subsistence, immediately return to God who gave them:(b) the souls of the righteous, being then made perfect in holiness, are received into the highest heavens, where they behold the face of God, in light and glory, waiting for the full redemption of their bodies.(c) And the souls of the wicked are cast into hell, where they remain in torments and utter darkness, reserved to the judgment of the great day.(d) Beside these two places, for souls separated from their bodies, the Scripture acknowledges none.

(a) Gen. 3:19; Acts 13:36.
(b) Luke 23:43; Eccles. 12:7.
(c) Hob. 12:23; II Cor. 5:1, 6, 8; Phil. 1:23, with Acts 3:21 & Eph. 4:10.
(d) Luke 16:23, 24; Acts 1:25; Jude ver. 6, 7; I Pet. 3:19.

II. At the last day, such as are found alive shall not die, but be changed:(e) and all the dead shall be raised up, with the selfsame bodies, and none other, although with different qualities, which shall be united again to their souls for ever.(f)

(e) I Thess. 4:17; I Cor. 15:51, 52.
(f) Job 19:26, 27; I Cor. 15:42, 43, 44.

III. The bodies of the unjust shall, by the power of Christ, be raised to dishonour: the bodies of the just, by His Spirit, unto honour; and be made conformable to His own glorious body.(g)

(g) Acts 24:15; John 5:28, 29; I Cor. 15:43; Phil. 3:21.

Chapter XXXIII.
Of the Last Judgment.


I. God hath appointed a day, wherein He will judge the world in righteousness, by Jesus Christ,(a) to whom all power and judgment is given of the Father.(b) In which day, not only the apostate angels shall be judged,(c) but likewise all persons that have lived upon earth shall appear before the tribunal of Christ, to give an account of their thoughts, words, and deeds; and to receive according to what they have done in the body, whether good or evil.(d)

(a) Acts 17:31.
(b) John 5:22, 27.
(c) I Cor. 6:3; Jude ver. 6; II Pet. 2:4.
(d) II Cor. 5:10; Eccles. 12:14; Rome. 2:16; Rome. 14:10, 12; Matt. 12:36, 37.

II. The end of Gods appointing this day is for the manifestation of the glory of His mercy, in the eternal salvation of the elect; and of His justice, in the damnation of the reprobate who are wicked and disobedient. For then shall the righteous go into everlasting life, and receive that fullness of joy and refreshing, which shall come from the presence of the Lord: but the wicked who know not God, and obey not the Gospel of Jesus Christ, shall be cast into eternal torments, and be punished with everlasting destruction from the presence of the Lord, and from the glory of His power.(e)

(e) Matt. 25:31 to the end; Rome. 2:5, 6; Rome. 9:22, 23; Matt. 25:21; Acts 3:19; II Thess. 1:7, 8, 9, 10.

III. As Christ would have us to be certainly persuaded that there shall be a day of judgment, both to deter all men from sin, and for the greater consolation of the godly in their adversity;(f) so will He have that day unknown to men, that they may shake off all carnal security, and be always watchful, because they know not at what hour the Lord will come; and may be ever prepared to say, Come, Lord Jesus, come quickly, AmenI, A. B., do swear that I do approve the doctrine, and discipline, or government established in the Church of England as containing all things necessary to salvation: and that I will not endeavour by myself or any other, directly or indirectly, to bring in any popish doctrine contrary to that which is so established; nor will I ever give my consent to alter the government of this Church by arcbbishops, bishops, deans, and archdeacons, &c., as it stands now established, and as by right it ought to stand, nor yet ever to subject it to the usurpations and superstitions of the see of Rome. And all these things I do plainly and sincerely acknowledge and swear, according to the plain and common sense and understanding of the same words, without any equivocation, or mental evasion, or secret reservation whatsoever. And this I do heartily, willingly, and truly, upon the faith of a Christian. So help me God in Jesus Christ.A Looking-glasse,
For Murderers and Blasphemers; wherein they [?]
Gods judgement shown upon a Keeper near Enfield C[hase]
desperately shot at [a] [M]an that intended to have stolen Dear, [?]
This was done on Monday night, the xii. day of June, being the same da[y] [?]
Tempest was in London. To the Tune of Jasper Cunningha[m]
YOu desperate Swearers,
     and foul Blasphemers all,
Give ear unto an accident,
     which lately did befall,
Upon a wicked Keeper,
     God did his Judgement show,
Near to the Chase of Enfield,
     as many People know.

Then lend attention
     to that which I repeat,
Wherein you may admire
     Gods judgements wondrous great,
And learn blasphemous Swearing
     to fl[e]e, for God says plain,
He will not hold him guiltless
     that takes his Name in vain.

Now to my Story
     I come with trembling fear,
A lewd ungodly Liver
     one night was stealing Dear:
The Keepers that with vigilance
     there nightly round did keep,
Upon this Venson-stealer
     most subtly did creep.

And having him encompassed,
     he could not escape away,
One Keeper to an other
     in desperate wise did say,
Now will I shoot this Fellow,
     according to the Law,
And thereupon, his Crosse-bowe
     he suddenly did draw.

The other being mild[r]
     did seek to turn his [?]
And said let us not kill [?]
     some other course we[?]
Here will we apprehen[d]
     for this his lawless dee[d] [?]
That by the course of [?]
     Law may on him pro[?]

The other being grace[?]
     and given un[to] strife, [?]
Said, if he b[?] Dee[?]
     or Man, Isle [ha]ve his [?]
This is my resolution [?]
     at him I mean to sh[?]
And therefore to dissw[ade]
     alas it is no boot.

With those blasphemo[us] [?]
     his Crosse-bowe up h[?]
And aimed at the Fell[low]
     whose breast with for[?]
And him of Life depri[ved]
     but mark the power [?]
Who at that instant se[?]
     did scourge him with [?]

For to this instant tim[?]
     he in that place doth f[?]
So holding of his Cro[?]
     within the shooting h[?]
Theirs none that can re[?]
     by any strength or sk[ill]
And as he first stood shoo[?]
     so now he stands st[ill]

The Second Part. To the same Tune.
ALso his wicked
     profane blasphemous tongue,
Which with vile swearing
     had done his Maker wrong,
Out of his mouth now hangs
     that every one may view
How God rewards Blasphemers
     and gives them there due.

One thing is worthy
     to bee observed well,
That at the season
     when this strange thing befell,
A Tempest fell in London
     upon that very day,
And this was done within that night
     as many people say.

If all Blasphemers
     in this kind were served,
Gods holy Precepts
     would better be observed,
But let all men be warned
     to flee this foul offence,
Which doth the Lord to anger
     above all sins licence.

And let all murderers
     be warned by this tale,
For God such foul offences
     to punish will not fail,
Oh doe not seek for vengeance
     which to the Lord belongs,
Who will when he thinks fitting
     revenge his servants wrongs.

Also this is a warning
     for those that live by stealing,
The Lord severely plagueth those
     who live by such false dealing,
As now he hath this wretched Thief
     who died in his sins,
And few that run so vile a race
     a better ending wins.

What ere you be give not your mind
     to live by pilfering theft,
But larne to labour with your hands
     and use some honest shift,
Then God will bless your labours
     what ere you take in hand,
And every thing shall prosper
     as well by sea as land.

In fine, let all bee warned
     at this Gods Judgement shown,
And think if you offend the like
     the case may be your own,
Provoke not God to execute
     his wrath on you for sin,
But by the example of these twain
     to mend your lives begin.

A New-yeeres-gift for the Pope.
Come see the difference plainly decided, between Truth and Falsehood
Not all the Popes Trinkets, which here are brought forth,
Can balance the Bible for weight, and true worth:
Your Bells, Beads and Crosses, you see will not do it,
Or pull down your Scale, with the Devil to boot.
To the Tune of, Thomas, you cannot, etc.


ALl you that desirous are to behold
     the difference twixt falsehood and faith,
Mark well this Emblem, one piece of pure gold,
     a Cart-load of false Coin outwayeth,
Then wisely consider and bear in your mind,
Though Sedans Instruments true faith to blind,
A thousand devises daily doe find;
     Yet all is in vain, they cannot, they cannot,
     Yet all is in vain they cannot.

The [diff]erence twixt Papist and Protestant here,
     yo[u'l] [ha]ve in a moment debated,
The [one] loves the Gospel that shines still clear,
     the other is more subtile-pated,
He will not be ruled by the Scriptures large scope,
But trusts in Traditions derived from the Pope,
By which to be saved he doth constantly hope:
     Fond fools y' are deceived, you cannot, etc.

True Justice, against whom no falsehood prevails,
     the case for both Parties decides
[And] here she doth hold up her unpartial Scales;
     no fictions nor lies she abides:
The Pope like a Martialist hardy and stout,
[Co]mes marching in pomp with all his brave rout,
[To] win by his multitude he makes no doubt:
     but alas father Pope you cannot, etc.

Thus are these two opposites come to the place,
     where truth must be proved by trial,
The Pope thinks with greatness to carry the grace,
     but Justice hath eyes to descry all:
The Scales are made even, the Bible's in one,
Which is the true means of Salvation alone,
They striving to pass it, doe strive till they groan;
     Yet all is in vain, they cannot, etc.

The Pope feeling he must be tried by the Bible,
     did seek to overcome it by might,
He tried by all means that for him was possible;
     but all he could bring was too light:
Their Masses and Dirges, with such superstitions,
Decrees and Decretals, with other Traditions,
The golden Legend with late new additions:
     Yet all is in vain, they cannot, etc.

Thus still the pure Gospel against falsehood prevails,
     which when the proud Prelate did see,
A Cart-load of Trinkets he puts in the Scales,
     and thrust it as full as might be,
With great wooden Crosses and many great babies,
The Pictures and Saints of a bevy of Ladies,
Who daily are worshipped by these grand Rabbis:
     Yet still father Pope you cannot, etc.
Yet still father Pope [you cannot, etc.]

A Justification of the Synod of Zion College, against
those, who say they have sate long, and done nothing.
1
THe Synod who dare to control,
That sit in Zion house,
The people looked for mountains, but,
They have brought forth a mouse:
Each man four shillings hath a day,
And do you think theyl lack ho,
When every man has so much pay,
To drink Wine and Tobacco.
     The Synod have full four years sate
     To find out a Religion,
     Yet to conclude, they know not what,
     They want a new Edition.

2.
Say all wise men, what shall we be,
Brownists, or else Presbyters,
Of the Antinomian Heresy,
Or Independent-Fighters:
Shall we be harmless Adamites,
And wear no clothes upon us,
Or shall we be base Catamites,
And damn Religion from us.
     The Synod have etc.

3.
Shall we be brave Apostolicks,
Or else all turn mad Arrians,
Or shall we leave such cursed tricks
And bee Episcoparians:
Shall wee be of the Sect of Love,
And meet in upper rooms,
And doe as doth the Spirit move,
When as the Sisters comes.
     The Synod have etc.

4.
Or shall we bee, as late we were,
For Government and Order,
And have a King and Monarchy
With Courts, the truth to further:
Shall we have Music now and Copes,
And kneel as we were wonted,
Instead of Presbyterian Popes,
Have Common-Prayer chanted.
     The Synod have etc.

5.
Pray tell us, what you do intend,
For, weed be something fine,
Will you our former errors mend,

Or for one give us twain.
Pray something now unto us show,
Give us the bad, or better:
Or what is old, or what is new,
And each will be your debtor.
     The Synod, etc.

6.
I wonder much, that you should want
Your learning, being huge,
You having that same Usurer,
Ycleped Doctor G------
But he good man is near his end,
The bell now for him toles,
Black-Friers poor have pried for him,
Ere since he sold them coals.
     The Synod, etc.

7.
Methinks, the place should help you make
Some truth for to rely on,
How heavenly King David spake,
When as he dwelt in Zion.
But it may be, in that your place
Things cannot well be scand;
Why then I wish you filled that house
Is in the holy Land.
     The Synod, etc.

8.
The Anabaptists are content
You should sit there for ever,
And say ast please the Parliament,
While they dip in the River:
The Brownists sure well pleased are,
To add unto your pay,
The Familists do domineer,
Because you nothing say.
The Synod have etc.

9.
The Independents do rejoice,
They now have won the field,
They say it is the Armies voice,
The Presbyters must yield:
Now Case must unto Goodwin stoop,
And Salami to Dell,
The Presbyters like rushes droop,
O this is wondrous well.
     The Synod, etc.

10.
Some say, like Tinkers you have dealt,
Who mending of a kettle,
Do make two more then ere were felt,
Or else things will not whittle.
And under a most good pretence,
That we should find much ease,
Religion quite is fled from hence,
Pray cure us this disease.
     The Synod, etc.

11.
Dub-dapper Sydrach Sympfon now
Like unto Simia flickers;
A deep and dread revenge doth vow,
On the Schoolmaster Vicars.
And Edwards, that same Hercules,
Will now write his Gangrene,
And therein praise the Sectaries,
The like was never seen-a.
     The Synod, etc.

12.
The Army swear, they will have none
But Independents sway,
And that the Presbyters each one
In office tother day;
And voted one day, and then nuld,
And then voted again,
Shall all out of the House be pulled,
The others only reign.
     The Synod, etc.

13.
And now farewell O Synod brave,
It is in vain to think,
We a Religion ere shall have,
While that your pockets chink.
Four shillings evry day, besides
Your greazie Benefices,
Makes you to have enlarged sides,
But pulls the truth in pieces.
     The Synod have full four years sate,
     To find out a Religion:
     Yet to conclude they know not what,
     They want a new Edition.

A Paraphrase upon the Lords Prayer, and the Creed.
IF any be distressed, and fine would gather
Some comfort, let him hasten to
For we of help and hope are all bereaven,
Unless thou succour us,

Thou show mercy there, and for the same
We praise thee, singing
Of our distresses, Lord, cast up the sum,
Show us thy joys, and let

We mortal are, and alter from our birth,
Thou constant art;
Thou made the Earth, Skies, Stars, and Planets seven,
Thy Name be blessed here,

Nothing we have wherewith our debts to pay,
Unless thou give to us,
Wherewith to cloth us, wherewith to be fed,
For without thee we want

We want, but want no sin, for no day passes
But we doe sin:
No man from sin that ever free did live;
Forgive us, Lord, our sins,

If we repent our sins thou ne'er disdain us;
We pardon
Forgive us that is past, and new path tread us;
Direct us always in thy truth,

As thine own people, and thy chosen Nation,
Into all truth, but
Thou that of all good graces art the giver,
[Permit us not to wander,

Us from th' assaults of World, of Flesh, of Devill,
So shall thy mercies free]
To these Petitions let both Church and Lay-men
With one consent of voice and heart, say

SInce it be fit that I account should give,
What way unto Salvation
Of my profession here the sum I gather,
First I confess a faith

In God who without helper or partaker,
Was of himself the Worlds
And first gave time his being, who gave breath,
To all the creatures

Our everlasting welfare doth consist,
In his great mercies,
The second person of that three in one,
The Fathers elect, and

That ever blessed and incarnate Word,
Which our Redeemer is, our life,
For why? by Satins guile we were deceived,
Christ was that means of help,

Yea when we were in danger to be lost,
Conceived for us
And that we might not ever be forlorn,
For our eternal safety he was

Borne as a man, that man might not miscarry,
Even of the substance
And lo a greater mercy and a wonder,
He that can make all suffer

The Jewish spite, which all the world reviled at,
And Romish tyrannies of
In him I doe believe who was envied,
Who with extremest hate

OUr Father,
--- which art in Heaven,
--- hallowed be thy Name:
--- thy kingdom come:
--- thy will be done on earth,
--- as it is in heaven:
--- give us this day
--- our daily bread:
--- forgive us our trespasses,
--- as we forgive
--- them their trespasses against us:
--- and lead us
--- not into temptation
[--- but deliver
--- us from all evill.]
--- Amen.

I Believe
--- in God the Father
--- Almighty maker
--- both of heaven and earth:
--- and in Jesus Christ
--- his only Son,
--- our Lord,
--- which was conceived
--- by the Holy Ghost,
--- borne
--- of the Virgin Mary,
--- suffered under
--- Pontius Pilot,
--- was crucified,

Who being life itself, to make assured
Our souls of safety, was both
And that no servile fear in us might dwell,
To conquer

Where no infernal power had power to lay
Command upon him, but on
The force of death and hell he did constrain,
And so in Triumph

Yea the Almighty power advanced his head,
As well above all things as
Then that from thence gifts might to men be given,
With glory

Where that supreme and everlasting Throne,
Which was prepared, he climbed
That blessed seat where he shall make abode,
To plead for us at

And no where should he be enthroned rather,
Then there, for he is God as is
And therefore with an equal love delight I,
To praise and serve them both as one

Yet in their office there's a difference,
And I believe that Jesus Christ
Shall in that great and universal doom,
Return, and that with Angels

To question such as at his Empire grudge,
Even those that have presumed him
And that black day shall be so Catholic[,
As I beleeve not only that

Shall to that grand Assize be summoned,]
But he will both adjudge them
Moreover in the Godhood I conceive,
Another Person in whom

For all my hope and blessedness were lost,
If I beeleeve not
Although vain Schismatics through pride and folly
Contemn her power, I doe believe

Chaste Spouse of Christ, for whom so many search,
By marks uncertain, the true
I doe believe, God keep us in this Union,
That there shall be forever

Of Gods elect, and that he still acquaints
His children in the fellowship
Though damned be men's natural condition,
By grace in Christ I look for

Of all my foul misdeeds, for there begins
Deaths end, which is the punishment
Moreover I the Sadducees infection
Abhor, and doe believe

Yea though I turn to dust, yet through God I,
Expect a glorious rising
And that exempted from the cares here rife,
I shall enjoy perfection,

That is not subject unto change or wasting,
But ever blessed, and for
This is my joy, which that it fail not when
It most should speed me, let God say

     To whom, that he so much vouchsafe me may,
     Thus as a member of the Church I pray.

--- dead and buried,
--- he descended into hell,
--- the third day
--- he arose again
--- from the dead,
--- he ascended into heaven
--- and sits on,
--- the right hand of God,
--- the Father,
--- Almighty:
--- from thence
--- he shall come
--- to judge
[--- the quicke
--- and the dead:]
--- I doe believe
--- in the Holy Ghost,
--- the holy
--- Catholic Church,
--- the Communion
--- of Saints,
--- the remission
--- of sins,
--- the resurrection
--- of the body,
--- and the life
--- everlasting.
--- Amen.
To the Right Honourable the Commons House of Parliament.

The humble petition of many of his majesty's subjects in and about the city of London, and several counties of the kingdom. Shows,

That whereas the government of archbishops and lord bishops, deans, and archdeacons, &c., with their courts and ministrations in them, have proved prejudicial and very dangerous both to the Church and Commonwealth, they themselves having formerly held that they have their jurisdiction or authority of human authority, till of these later times, being further pressed about the unlawfulness, that they have claimed their calling immediately from the Lord Jesus Christ, which is against the laws of this kingdom, and derogatory to his majesty and his state royal. And whereas the said government is found by woeful experience to be a main cause and occasion of many foul evils, pressures and grievances of a very high nature unto his majesty's subjects in their own consciences, liberties and estates, as in a schedule of particulars hereunto annexed may in part appear:

We therefore most humbly pray, and beseech this [Page 538] honourable assembly, the premises considered, that the said government with all its dependencies, roots and branches, may be abolished, and all laws in their behalf made void, and the government according to God's word may be rightly placed amongst us: and we your humble suppliants, as in duty we are bound, will daily pray for his majesty's long and happy reign over us, and for the prosperous success of this high and honourable Court of Parliament.

A particular of the manifold evils, pressures, and grievances caused, practised and occasioned by the prelates and their dependents.

1. The subjecting and enthralling all ministers under them and their authority, and so by degrees exempting them from the temporal power; whence follows,

2. The faint-heartedness of ministers to preach the truth of God, lest they should displease the prelates; as namely, the doctrine of predestination, of free grace, of perseverance, of original sin remaining after baptism, of the sabbath, the doctrine against universal grace, election for faith foreseen, freewill against Antichrist, non-residents, human inventions in God's worship; all which are generally withheld from the people's knowledge, because not relishing to the bishops.

3. The encouragement of ministers to despise the temporal magistracy, the nobles and gentry of the land; to abuse the subjects, and live contentiously with their neighbours, knowing that they, being the bishops' creatures, shall be supported.

4. The restraint of many godly and able men from the ministry, and thrusting out of many congregations their faithful, diligent and powerful ministers, who lived peaceably with them, and did them good, only because they cannot in conscience submit unto and maintain the bishops' needless devices; nay, sometimes for no other cause but for their zeal in preaching, or great auditories.

[Page 539] 5. The suppressing of that godly design set on foot by certain saints, and sugared with many great gifts by sundry well-affected persons for the buying of impropriations, and placing of able ministers in them, maintaining of lectures, and founding of free schools, which the prelates could not endure, lest it should darken their glories, and draw the ministers from their dependence upon them.

6. The great increase of idle, lewd and dissolute, ignorant and erroneous men in the ministry, which swarm like the locusts of Egypt over the whole kingdom; and will they but wear a canonical coat, a surplice, a hood, bow at the name of Jesus, and be zealous of superstitious ceremonies, they may live as they list, confront whom they please, preach and vent what errors they will, and neglect preaching at their pleasures without control.

7. The discouragement of many from bringing up their children in learning; the many schisms, errors, and strange opinions which are in the Church; great corruptions which are in the Universities; the gross and lamentable ignorance almost everywhere among the people; the want of preaching ministers in very many places both of England and Wales; the loathing of the ministry, and the general defection to all manner of profaneness.

8. The swarming of lascivious, idle, and unprofitable books and pamphlets, play-books and ballads; as namely, Ovid's Fits of Love, The Parliament Of Women, which came out at the dissolving of the last Parliament; Barns's Poems, Parker's Ballads, in disgrace of religion, to the increase of all vice, and withdrawing of people from reading, studying, and hearing the word of God, and other good books.

9. The hindering of godly books to be printed, the blotting out or perverting those which they suffer, all or most of that which strikes either at popery or Arminianism: the adding of what or where pleases them, and the restraint of reprinting books formerly licensed, without relicensing.

[Page 540] 10. The publishing and venting of popish, Arminian, and other dangerous books and tenets; as namely, 'That the Church of Rome is a true Church, and in the worst times never erred in fundamentals;' 'that the subjects have no propriety in their estates, but that the king may take from them what he pleases;' 'that all is the king's, and that he is bound by no law;' and many other, from the former whereof hath sprung:

11. The growth of popery and increase of papists, priests, and Jesuits in sundry places, but especially about London since the Reformation; the frequent venting of crucifixes and popish pictures both engraven and printed, and the placing of such in Bibles.

12. The multitude of monopolies and patents, drawing with them innumerable perjuries; the large increase of customs and impositions upon commodities, the ship money, and many other great burdens upon the commonwealth, under which all groan.

13. Moreover, the offices and jurisdictions of archbishops, lord bishops, deans, archdeacons, being the same way of church government which is in the Romish Church, and which was in England in the time of popery, little change thereof being made (except only the head from whence it was derived), the same arguments supporting the pope which do uphold the prelates, and overthrowing the prelates, which do pull down the pope; and other reformed Churches having upon their rejection of the pope cast the prelates out also as members of the beast. Hence it is that the prelates here in England, by themselves or their disciples, plead and maintain that the pope is not Antichrist, and that the Church of Rome is a true Church, hath not erred in fundamental points, and that salvation is attainable in that religion, and therefore have restrained to pray for the conversion of our sovereign lady the queen. Hence also hath come:

[Page 541] 14. The great conformity and likeness both continued and increased of our Church to the Church of Rome, in vestures, postures, ceremonies, and administrations, namely as the bishop's rochets and the lawn-sleeves, the four-cornered cap, the cope and surplice, the tippet, the hood, and the canonical coat; the pulpits clothed, especially now of late, with the Jesuits' badge upon them every way.

15. The standing up at Gloria Patri and at the reading of the Gospel, praying towards the East, the bowing at the name of Jesus, the bowing to the altar towards the East, cross in baptism, the kneeling at the Communion.

16. The turning of the Communion table altar-wise, setting images, crucifixes, and conceits over them, and tapers and books upon them, and bowing or adoring to or before them; the reading of the second service at the altar, and forcing people to come up thither to receive, or else denying the Sacrament to them; terming the altar to be the mercy-seat, or the place of God Almighty in the church, which is a plain device to usher in the Mass.

17. The christening and consecrating of churches and chapels, the consecrating fonts, tables, pulpits, chalices, churchyards, and many other things, and putting holiness in them; yea, reconsecrating upon pretended pollution, as though everything were unclean without their consecrating; and for want of this sundry churches have been interdicted, and kept from use as polluted.

18. The Liturgy for the most part is framed out of the Romish breviary, rituals, mass-book, also the book of Ordination for archbishops and ministers framed out of the Roman Pontifical.

19. The multitude of canons formerly made, wherein among other things excommunication, ipso facto, is denounced for speaking of a word against the devices abovesaid, or subscription thereunto, though no law enjoined a [Page 542] restraint from the ministry without subscription, and appeal is denied to any that should refuse subscription or unlawful conformity, though he be never so much wronged by the inferior judges. Also the canons made in the late sacred Synod, as they call it, wherein are many strange and dangerous devices to undermine the Gospel and the subjects liberties, to propagate popery, to spoil God's people, ensnare ministers, and other students, and so to draw all into an absolute subjection and thraldom to them and their government, spoiling both the king and the parliament of their power.

20. The countenancing of plurality of benefices, prohibiting of marriages without their licence, at certain times, almost half the year, and licensing of marriages without banns asking.

21. Profanation of the Lord's Day, pleading for it, and enjoining ministers to read a declaration set forth (as it is thought) by their procurement for tolerating of sports upon that day, suspending and depriving many godly ministers for not reading the same only out of conscience, because it was against the law of God so to do, and no law of the land to enjoin it.

22. The pressing of the strict observation of the saints' days, whereby great sums of money are drawn out of men's purses for working on them; a very high burden on most people, who getting their living on their daily employments, must either omit them, and be idle, or part with their money, whereby many poor families are undone, or brought behindhand; yet many churchwardens are sued, or threatened to be sued by their troublesome ministers, as perjured persons, for not presenting their parishioners who failed in observing holy days.

23. The great increase and frequency of whoredoms and adulteries, occasioned by the prelates' corrupt administration of justice in such cases, who taking upon them the punishment [Page 543] of it, do turn all into moneys for the filling of their purses; and lest their officers should defraud them of their gain, they have in their late canon, instead of remedying these vices, decreed that the commutation of penance shall not be without the bishops' privity.

24. The general abuse of that great ordinance of excommunication, which God hath left in His Church as the last and greatest punishment which the Church can inflict upon obstinate and great offenders; and the prelates and their officers, who of right have nothing to do with it, do daily excommunicate men, either for doing that which is lawful, or for vain, idle, and trivial matters, as working, or opening a shop on a holy day, for not appearing at every beck upon their summons, not paying a fee, or the like; yea, they have made it, as they do all other things, a hook or instrument wherewith to empty men's purses, and to advance their own greatness; and so that sacred ordinance of God, by their perverting of it, becomes contemptible to all men, and is seldom or never used against notorious offenders, who for the most part are their favourites.

25. Yea further, the pride and ambition of the prelates being boundless, unwilling to be subject either to man or laws, they claim their office and jurisdiction to be Jure Divino, exercise ecclesiastical authority in their own names and rights, and under their own seals, and take upon them temporal dignities, places and offices in the commonwealth, that they may sway both swords.

26. Whence follows the taking commissions in their own courts and consistories, and where else they sit in matters determinable of right at common law, the putting of ministers upon parishes, without the patron's and people's consent.

27. The imposing of oaths of various and trivial articles yearly upon churchwardens and sidesmen, which they cannot take without perjury, unless they fall at jars continually with [Page 544] their ministers and neighbours, and wholly neglect their own calling.

28. The exercising of the oath ex officio, and other proceedings by way of inquisition, reaching even to men's thoughts, the apprehending and detaining of men by pursuivants, the frequent suspending and depriving of ministers, fining and imprisoning of all sorts of people, breaking up of men's houses and studies, taking away men's books, letters, and other writings, seizing upon their estates, removing them from their callings, separating between them and their wives against both their wills, the rejecting of prohibitions with threatenings, and the doing of many other outrages, to the utter infringing the laws of the realm and the subjects liberties, and ruining of them and their families; and of later time the judges of the land are so awed with the power and greatness of the prelates, and other ways promoted, that neither prohibition, Habeas Corpus, nor any other lawful remedy can be had, or take place, for the distressed subjects in most cases; only papists, Jesuits, priests, and such others as propagate popery or Arminianism, are countenanced, spared, and have much liberty; and from hence followed amongst others these dangerous consequences:

1. The general hope and expectation of the Romish party, that their superstitious religion will ere long be fully planted in this kingdom again, and so they are encouraged to persist therein, and to practise the same openly in divers places, to the high dishonour of God, and contrary to the laws of the realm.

2. The discouragement and destruction of all good subjects, of whom are multitudes, both clothiers, merchants, and others, who being deprived of their ministers, and overburdened with these pressures, have departed the kingdom to Holland, and other parts, and have drawn with them a great manufacture of cloth and trading out of the [Page 545] land into other places where they reside, whereby wool, the great staple of the kingdom, is become of small value, and vends not; trading is decayed, many poor people want work, seamen lose employment, and the whole land is much impoverished, to the great dishonour of this kingdom and blemishment to the government thereof.

3. The present wars and commotions happened between his majesty and his subjects of Scotland, wherein his majesty and all his kingdoms are endangered, and suffer greatly, and are like to become a prey to the common enemy in case the wars go on, which we exceedingly fear will not only go on, but also increase to an utter ruin of all, unless the prelates with their dependencies be removed out of England, and also they and their practices, who, as we under your honour's favours, do verily believe and conceive have occasioned the quarrel.

All which we humbly refer to the consideration of this honourable assembly, desiring the Lord of heaven to direct you in the right way to redress all these evils.he Sinners Redemption.
Wherein is described the blessed Nativity of our Lord Jesus Christ, toga
there with his life on earth, and his precious death on the Cross for
Mankind.
To the tune of, The bleeding heart. Or, In Create, etc.
ALL you that are to mirth inclined,
Consider well, and bear in mind,
What our good God hath for us done,
In sending his beloved Son,
     For to redeem our souls from thrall,
     This was the Saviour of us all.

Let all our songs of praises be
Unto his heavenly Majesty,
And evermore amongst your mirth,
Remember Christ our Saviours birth

The five and twentieth of December,
Good cause have we for to remember,
In Bethelem upon that morn,
There was our blessed Mossies borne.

The night before that happy tide,
The spotless Virgin and her Guide,
Went long time seeking up and down
To find their lodging in the town.

But mark how all things came to pass
The Inns and lodgings so filled was,
That they could have no room at all,
But in a silly Ox his stall.

This night the Virgin Mary mild,
Was safe delivered of a Child,
According unto heavens decree,
Mans sweet salvation for to be.

Near Bethelem did Shepherds keep,

Their herds and flocks of feeding sheep
To them Gods Angels did appear,
Which put the shepherds in great fear

Prepare and go the Angel said,
To Bethelem, be not afraid,
There shall you find this blessed morn
The Princely Babe sweet Jesus born.
With thankful heart and joyful mind,
The shepherds went the Babe to find,
And as the heavenly Angel told,
They did our Saviour Christ behold.

Within a manger was he laid,
The Virgin Mary by him staid,
Attending on the Lord of life,
Being both Mother, Maid, and Wife.

Three Eastern Wise men from afar,
Directed by a glorious star,
Came boldly on and made no stay,
Until they came where Jesus lay.

And being come into the place,
Whereas the blessed Mossies was,
They humbly laid before his feet,
Their gifts of gold and odours sweet

See how the Lord of heaven and earth,
Showed himself lowly in his birth.
A sweet example for Mankind
To learn to bear an humble mind.

The second part, To the same tune.
NO costly robes nor rich attire,
Did Jesus Christ our Lord desire,
No music nor sweet harmony,
Till glorious Angels from on hie,

Did in melodious manner sing
Praises unto our heavenly King,
All Honour, Glory, Might and Power,
Be unto Christ for evermore.

If queers of Angels did rejoice,
Well may Mankind with heart & voice
Sing praises to the God of Heaven,
That unto us his Son hath given.

Moreover let us every one,
Call unto mind and think upon
His righteous life, and how hee did
To have poor sinners justifid.

Suppose O man that thou should lieIn prison strong condemned to die,
And that no friend upon the earth,
Could ransom thee from cruel death:

Except thou can some party find,
That for thy sake will be so kind,
His own hearts blood for to dispense,
And lose his life in thy defence:
Such was the love of Christ when we
Were lost to hell perpetually,
To save us from the gulf of woe,
Himself much pains did undergo.

While in this world he did remain,
He never spent an hour in vain,
In fasting and in prayer divine,
He daily spent away his time.

He in their Temples daily taught,
And many wonders strange he wrought:He gave the blind their perfect sight,
And made the lame to go upright.

He curd the Lepers of their evils,
And by his power he cast out devils,
He raised Lazarus from the grave,
And to the sick their health he gave.

But yet for all these wonders wrought:The Jews his dear destruction sought
The traitor Judas was the man,That with a kiss betrayed him than.

Then was he led to judgment hall,
Like one despised amongst them all,
And had the sentence given, that he
Should suffer death upon a tree.

Unto his execution place,
They brought him on with much disgrace,
With vile reproachful taunts & scorns
They crowned him with a wreath of thorns.

Then to the cross through hands & feet,
They nayld our blessed Redeemer sweet,
And further to augment his smart.
With bloody spear they pierced his heart

Thus have you seen and heard aright,
The love of Christ, the Lord of Might,
And how he shed his preciorus blood,
Only to doe us sinners good:
     And to redeem our souls from thrall,
     This was the Saviour of us all.
A
SONG OF ZION
OF THE
BEAUTY OF BETHELL
The Glory of GODS own HOUSE.
By a CITIZEN of ZION
Essay.35.10.
Psal.137.3.
psal.87.2.3.

ONe aching believers hearts are fixed upon,
     that thing of God they are to seek alone;
And seeking seek they must till they obtain,
     b preferring it before all earthly gain.

a psal.27.4.
pro.2.1,2,3,4.

b Mat.13.44,45.
psal.84.1,2,3,4,
&10.

c That precious thing is, that they may be blessed,
     to sit in * Gods own House, and there to rest,
Even all their days, in glory to abide,
     what ever outward want they have beside.

c psal.84.4.

* prove.8.34.
Cant.1.7.8.

d That they may view the beauty of the Lord,
     and in his worship ever more accord:
e Gods glory is the thing they doe desire,
     and in his Temple daily to enquire.

d psal.48.1,2,
&84.1,10,11.

e &17.4.

f Till this obtained be, no rest they have,
     of God by Christ, this fervently they crave;
g Christs glorious face doth yield them such delight,
     h which chiefly in his House doth shine so bright.

f psa.132.1,2,3.

g Cant.1.7,8.9.

h psal.76.2.
psal.68.24,&
50.2.

The i Tabernacle this sweet House did show,
     the k Temple of it, was a Type we know;
Yet both but glimpses of this l Spiritual House,
     of lively stones conjoint most precious.

i psal.15.1.2.

k Exo26.1.4.
&25.8. 2Cor.
6,16,17. 1Kin.
9.3. with l 1
pet.2.5.&5 1,
2. Eph.2.19 21,
22.

m Christ Jesus to this House is th only door,
     n of food and raiment theres sufficient store;
o In it is righteousness, great peace and joy,
     p the surest safety, freedom from annoy.

m Io.10.1.7.

n psal.23.1,2.

o Rome.14.17.

p psal.27,4.5.
Isa.4,5,6.
Reve.3.7,10.

q At gates thereof, grave Porters watchfully,
     r Do keep out all, that work iniquity:
s In it the tree of life is found to grow,
     from which unto the faithful, life doth flow.

q 2 Cor.23,19.

r Eze.44,6,9.
Reve.21,27,&

s 2,1,7,17.
Eze.47,1,9.
Reve.22,1,2.

t Here are no Dogs, nor Wolves, nor noisome beasts,
     u of Sheep that strayed, now home brought it, consists;
w The wall salvation is, the Bulwarks praise,
     x Devouring fire, doth compass it always.

t Isa 35.8,9.

u Reve.22,15.

w 1pet.2.5,25.

x Isa 26.1,2,
11.
Isa 4.5,6.

y Our great Jehovahs sweetness are there,
     no where to Christians they so much appear;
z The treasures there contained, who can relate?
     a or pleasures great, which last beyond all date.

y psal.27.4.
Isa.25,6.
Can.1.8,9.

z Mat.13.44.

a psal.36.8,9.

a Come see and taste this fullness of all good.
     b ye, that in Babel have with peril stood
c Unsatisfied with husks, amongst many Swine;
     d enter this lovely House, that's so divine.

a Isa 2.3. Za.8
21,23, & b Za.2
6,7.
Rev.14.8,9.

c Luck 15.16.20.

d Psal.100.4.

What this House is, if further you demand,
     e Of Saints, it is an Armed warlike band:
f Who are in Christs name gathered into one,
     to worship God, as g Christ commands alone.

e 1 Cor.14.33.
Cant.6.4,10,13.

f Mat.18.15,20.
Eph.4.12,16.

g Mat.28.20.

h They do profess, to Christ they all belong,
     i in Christ united, they become most strong:
k With Spiritual weapons they do daily fight,
     and in that warfare they do most delight.

h Isa 33.22.
Is 25.9, 44,.

i Eph.2,20,21
22,

k 1 Cor.10.4,
&12.9.10.

l Unto them Members they have power to take,
     m and to cast out al, that the truth forsake:
n Gods order only, they do most desire,
     o all men's devices they adjudge to fire.

l Eph.2.12,19.
Act.9.26.

m Mat.18.17.

n 1 Cor.5.7,13.
1 Cor.14.33.
Psal.68.24.

o Mat.15.6,9.
Deu.12.2.3,8,
11,32.

p They of themselves, Church Officers Ordain,
     q Pastors who feed the flock they will maintain:
r Men's Doctrines they will prove and daily try,
     receiving truth, approving no mans lie.

p Act.6.3,5,&
14,23.

q 1 Tim.5,17,18.

r 1 John 4.1.
Act.17.11.
1 Thess.5.21.

s Christ as their only Prophet they will hear,
     t Christ as their only Priest, they hold most dear:
u To Christ as only King theyl Subjects be,
     in Church affairs, in these they all agree.

s Mat.23.8,10.
Acts 3.22.

t phil.3.8.

u Isa.26,13.&
33,22,&4,12.
Mat.28.18,20,
&15,8,9. He,3,2

w If any shall this House henceforth deride,
     and scorning it, in Babel still abide
Before Gods face, as foes they must be slain,
     whose rule and Kingdom proudly they disdain.

w Neh.1.2,3.
Zac.4,10,6,7.

x pro.8.1,34,36.
Rev.14.7,9.&
18,4.
Luck 19.27.
pro.1.20.23.24.
Ezr.6.12.

Awake Awake, put on strength (O. Zion) put on thy beautiful garments; Oh Jerusalem, the holy City, for henceforth there shall no more come into thee
the uncircumcised and the unclean shake thy self from the dust, arise and sit down, oh Jerusalem, loose thy self from the bands of thy neck, oh Captive, Daughter
of Zion. Esa.52. 1, 2.
Render unto Caesar the things that are Caesars, and unto God, the things that are Gods, Mat.22.21.
A Warning for Swearers and Blasphemers.
Showing Gods fearful Judgements against divers for profaning his holy name by swearing.
Necessary to be set up and read in every house, for the avoiding of Oaths.


THou that these Lines dost either hear or read,
Consider with thy self, and take good heed.
Read them, and let them never be forgot.
They doe concern thy Soul, then slight them not.
Thea Fiends of hell believe there is a God,
And fear and tremble at his angry Rod:
They doe confess his glorious Excellence,
And his almighty Powers Omnipotence.
But Man his choicest, and his chiefest Creature,
Is so rebellious against God and Nature,
That he against Heaven dares both blaspheme and swear
And (worse then Fiends) they not believe or fear:
So that the Earth doth breed, feed, and retain
Worse Monsters, then there doth in Hell remain.
If men believed the word that God hath spoke,
They would believe that word should ne'er be broke.
In His enacted Lawb is one Decree,
That all who take his Name in vain, shall be
Accounted guilty, and his fearful wrath
Will hold them worthy of eternal death.
Again, it is said, Letc the Blasphemer dye,
Let him be stoned for his Blasphemy.
And evil tongues, who dare to Curse adventer,
Shall into Heavensd blessedness not enter.
And Christ (when on the eareth he lived here)
Forbade us thate at all we should not swear.
And in the eleventh of Deutronomony again,
We are commanded, not to swear in vain.

     Thef Heathen to blaspheme their gods abhorred,
Yet Christians wilfully blaspheme the Lord.
Whoever to revile the gods were known,
In Rome, were from the Rock Tarpeius thrown.
The Egyptians Law was, he should lose his head.
Amongst Scithians, life and goods were forfeited.
These grievous punishments did Pagans use
Against all them that did their gods abuse.

     King Donalds Law in Scotland not forgot,
Who burnt them through the lip[s] with [i]rons hot.
And when King Edmond here had Regal state,
All Swearers he did excommunicate.
And Philip King of France (a Prince renownd)
Ordained that all Blasphemers should be drowned.
The Emperor Maximilian did decree
That all vain Swearers should beheaded be.
The Earl of Flanders, Philip did ordain,
Their loss of life and goods, that swore in vain.
Saint Lewis the King of France, enacted there
That for the first time any one did swear,
Into Imprisonment one month was cast,
And stand within the Pillory at last.
But if the second time again they swore,
One with an iron hot their tongues did bore.
And who the third time in that fault did slip
Were likewise board through the under-lip.
For the fourth time most grievous pains belongs,
He cause to be cut off their lips and tongues.
Henry the fifth of England, that good King,
His Court to such conformity did bring,
That every Duke should forty shillings pay
For every oath he swore,without delay.
Each Baron twenty, Knights or Esquires offence
Paid ten: and every Yeoman twenty pence.
The Boys and Pages all were whipped most fine,
That durst abuse the Majesty divine.

     Thus Pagan Princes with sharpe Laws with-stood
Profaning of their Gods of stone or wood.
And Christian Kings and Rulers formerly,
Have most severely punished Blasphemy.
And shall an Heathen or an Infidel,
That knows no joys of heaven, or pains of hell,
More reverence to his devilish Idols show,
Then we doe to the true God, whom wee know?
If we remember well but what we were,
And what we are, we would not dare to swear.
Poor trunks of Earth; filled with uncertain breath,
By nature, heirs to everlasting death,
Most miserable wretches, most ingrate
Against God, that did elect us, and create,
Redeemed, conserved, preserved, and sanctified,
And gives us hope we shall be glorified;
H' hath given us being, life, sense, reason, wit,
Wealth, and all things his providence thinks fit:

a James.

b Exod. 20.

c Leviticus 24.

d 1 Cor. 6.10.

e Matth. 5.

f GOD himself
complains that
men blaspheme
him, Essay.52.5.
The names of
blasphemy is writ
upon the 10 heads
of Antichrist, A-
pose. 13.1. Cursing
is forbidden by
[?] Apostle, when
[?]ith, Bless, I
say, and curse not.
Rome. 12.14. Our
Saviour comman-
death us to bless
them that curse
us, Matth. 5.44.
Bless them that
curse you, & pray
for them which
hurt you, Luke
6.28. Accustom
not thy mouth to
swearing, for in it
are many falls, nei-
there take up for a
custom the na-
ming of the holy
One, for thou
shalt not bee un
punished for such
things, Ecclesiasti-
cus; 23.9. The
plague shall never
go from the house
of the swearer. Id.
     Who so swears
falsely, calls the
God of Truth to
witness a lye. Who
so swears as hee
thinks, may be de-
ceived. Who so
swears unreve-
rently, dishonou-
reth God. Who so
swears deceitful
lie, abuses Chri-
stian fidelity. Who
so swears idly,
abuses the credit
of a lawful oath.
Who so swears ac-
customably, God
will plague.

And for requital we (quite void of grace)
Curse, swear, and blaspheme him to his face.
Oh the supernal patience of our God,
That bears with man (a sin-polluted clod)
When half such treasons against an earthly King
Would many a traitor to confusion bring!

     Suppose a man should take a Whelp and breed him
Should stroke him, and make much of him, and feed him
How will that Cur love him beyond all other:
Never forsaking him to serve another.
Ant if hee should most disobediently
Into his Masters face, or throat to fly,
Sure every man that lives upon the ground,
Would say, a hanging's fit for such a Hound.
And worser then so many dogs are they
That against their God with oaths doe bark and bray,
And if Repentance doe not Mercy win,
They'll hang in Hell like Hell-hounds for their sin.
Of all black crimes from Belzebubs damned treasure,
This Swearing sin no profit yields, nor pleasure:
Nor gains the Swearer here but Earths vexation,
With change of his salvation for damnation.
It is a sin that yields us no excuse,
(For what excuse can be for Gods abuse?)
And though our other faults by death doe end,
Yet Blasphemy doth after death extend,
For to the damned in Hell this curse is given,
They for their pains blasphemed the God of heaven.
Examples on the earth have many been
As late in sundry places have been seen.
At Mantua two brave Ruffians in their game,
Swore and blasphemed our blessed Saviours Name,
Where Gods just judgement (full of fear and dread)
Cause both their eyes to drop from out their head.
In Rome, a child but five years old, that swore,
Was snatched up by the Devil, and seen no more.
And at Ragouse, a Mariner did swear,
As if he would Gods name in sunder tear,
When falling overboard, was drowned and tossed,
And nothing but his tongue was only lost.
Remember this you sinful sons ofg Men,
Think how that Christ redeemed you from Hells den.
His mercy he hath given in multitude,
Requite him not with vile ingratitude:
He made the Ear and Eye, and hears and sees
The Swearers execrable oaths and lies.
The Godhood of the Father they contemn,
Against the Sons Redemption they blaspheme.
The Holy Spirit grievously they grieve,
And head-long into hell themselves they drive.
It is in vain for mortal men to think,
Gods Justice is asleep, although it wink.
Or that his arm is shortened in these times,
That hee cannot reach home to punish crimes.
Oh think not so, it is but the Devils illusion,
To draw us desperately to our confusion,
Some say, that it is their anger makes them swear,
And oaths are out before they are aware:
But being crossed with losses, and perplexed,
They think no harm, but swear as being vexed:
And some there are that swear for complement,
Make oaths their grace and speeches ornament,
Their sweet Rhetorical fine Eloquence,
Their Reputations only excellence.
Their valour, whom the Devil doth inflame
To abuse their Makers and Redeemers Name.
Think but of this, you that doe God forget,
Your poor excuses cannot pay this debt.
Remember that our sinful souls did cost
A price too great to be by swearing lost.
And blessed was our last good parliament,
Who made an Act for Swearers punishment,
And blessed shall be each Magistrates good name,
That carefully doth execute the same:
Those that are zealous for Gods glory here,
(No doubt) in heaven shall have true glory there.
Which that we may have, humbly I implore
Of Him that rules and reigns for evermore,
The Eternal Lord of Lords, and King of Kings,
Before whose Throne blessed Saints and Angels sings
All power, praise, glory, majesty, thansgiving,
Ascribed be to him that's ever-living.

g Alfred an Eng-
lish Earl, conspi-
ring to put out K.
Adelstanes eyes at
Winchester, for-
swear the treason
in Saint Peters
Church at Rome,
and fell down
dead presently.
Earl Godwin mur-
thered Prince Al-
fred brother to
king Edward Con-
fessor, and being at
dinner, the King
charged him with
the murder, then
Godwin swore by
bread, and prayed
it might choke
him if hee were
guilty, and imme-
diately it choked
him in the place:
his lands also sunk
into the sea, & are
called Godwin-
sands. K. Stephen
forswore himself
to King Henry I.
and lived in con-
tinuall trouble, &
died in perplexity
of mind. Edward
4. brake his oath,
made at York, that
he came not with
intent to seize the
Kingdom, and
breaking the oath,
was punished with a
troublesome reign,
his brethren and
children all (ex-
cept one) murthe-
red: and not any
of his issue reign
ed after him. To
ger Mortimer, a
great Peer of this
land, for breaking
his oath to King
Edward the 2. was
most ignominy
ously hanged, bo-
weld and quarte-
red. M. Fox in his
Book of Martyrs,
declares of one Ri-
chard Long of Ca-
lice, that forswore
himself to accuse
one Smith for ea-
ting flesh in Lent,
after which oath
Long went pre-
sently and drown
ed himself. One
Grimwood at Hit
cham in Suffolk
forswore himself,
and his bowels
burst out. One we
dow Barnes, for
the like sin cast
her self out of her
window in Corn
hill, and brake her
neck. Anne Ave-
ris forswore her
self in Woodstreet
for six pound of
Tow, desiring
God she sink
down, which fear-
fully happened: one
Lea in Sunne-alley
without Bishops
gate, forswore him
self, & after ripped
out his guts.

